In my opinion, the literature programme was shaped by middle-aged ladies according to their interests.
From Russian literature of the 19th century we preferred Danilevsky and Volkonsky.
They wrote fiction, of course, from the point of view of those very ladies of a certain age.
But the psychology and suffering of the heroines of Tolstoy and Turgenev are not so interesting for adolescents.
Teenagers are generally not interested in the psychology of heroes.
Many thanks, it was very interesting.
Perhaps the roses were plush to represent a particular type of them?
There are roses of this colour and with this petal structure, resembling velvet, usually dark red or burgundy tones.
And light-coloured roses look different, with the petals having a satin or silky sheen.
Sharks are attacking surfers, mistaking them for turtles...
Bulls are color-blind, it seems.
Bears eat carrion...
Gorillas MUST NOT be looked in the eye - in some safari parks visitors are given glasses with eyes drawn on them looking away.
Bees are still guided by smell...
Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105х195 mattress.
The "Micropack Prestige" model: comfort and natural ingredients.
The mattress has different levels of firmness on each side: the medium-firm side is made of latex-coated coconut fiber and natural latex, and the medium-soft side is made of a layer of natural latex.
The 1000-spring-per-square-metre spring block quickly adapts to the sleeper's body, preventing the 'wave' or 'hammock' effect.
Among the benefits of the model, it is necessary to highlight the breathable materials.
Latex, which is perforated for breathability, naturally ventilates well, as does coconut coir.
This ensures a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
The mattress is also covered by an extended warranty period.
The official warranty period from the manufacturer is 5 years, in reality, the mattress will last longer.
Dust and dirt protection is provided by the removable jacquard cover that comes with it.
Pair your mattress with an orthopedic pillow - it is recommended to support the optimal position of the spine during sleep.
The filling determines the purpose of the sides - the coconut serves as anatomical support for the back, the latex relaxes the muscles.
Use your brain and get rid of such relatives!
It's better not to have any at all than ones like these...
Either find a third-party driver, or one who is willing to invest and work with you as a partner.
If it doesn’t work out, sell the car, even at a loss, don’t be stingy.
Next time, you better think about it...
Andrei, you have been clearly explained that pensioners work in schools, they will not work in the command line.
The computer science teacher won’t be able to help either, he wasn’t taught this, the kids are playing games on Windows.
So, there is no support.
I remember with horror those banquets and guests at my parents' house.
The guests are at the door, and the cutlets are still being seared on the stove, and the mother is frantically mopping the floor.
Lord, I was already exhausted when I sat down at the table.
And then wash the dishes, clean the house.
A week before the holiday, you drag groceries, two days of cooking, and a day of cleaning up after.
What about the guests?
They're doing well, and they always take a cake with them.
Ever since then, I don't like holidays and guests.
Even for my family, I set the table according to the minimum wage.
And I make treats for them, I bake very often just for the fun of it.
Germany: A fourth coronavirus vaccine is inevitable
The fourth vaccination will be needed in the summer or fall of 2022.
According to the expert, the current vaccination in Germany will not be the last, but will continue with renewed vigour.
Despite an active vaccination campaign in Germany, two or three doses of the corona vaccine will probably not be enough for full protection.
This is the conviction of the head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigeldt.
This was reported by Die Welt on Saturday, 11 December.
“We expect that the fourth vaccination will be required in the summer at the latest in the autumn”, the expert believes.
In addition, Vaegeldt hopes that the fourth coronavirus vaccination can be carried out "in combination with the flu vaccination."
This will help achieve the best results.
In addition, enhanced vaccination can help in the fight against the spread of the new Omicron strain of the coronavirus.
Moreover, the new variant is especially dangerous.
For example, the probability of reinfection with Omicron is three times higher than with the Delta or Beta strains.
This is suggested by the results of a preliminary study conducted in South Africa.
Based on this, the BioNTech/Pfizer manufacturers plan to provide an Omicron-adapted vaccine by March 2022.
The companies emphasize that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the new Omicron variant of the coronavirus.
The BioNTech and Pfizer study showed that the vaccine's efficacy is substantially lower with two doses: "neutralizing potential is reduced by more than 25 times."
"This indicates that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the Omicron variant," said BioNTech and Pfizer.
That's why a third dose is needed.
Experts are insisting on speeding up the pace of vaccination in the country.
For example, the president of the German Society of Infectious Diseases, Bernd Salzberger, is in favour of reducing the interval between the second and third vaccinations.
Moreover, according to Salzberger, the accelerated vaccination will affect the spread of both the delta virus and the omicron variant of the coronavirus.
"The experience of Israel shows this very convincingly", the expert emphasized.
Pontoon21 wobbler, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54 mm, 8.5 g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special branch of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (as well as the Kalikana Vib series) differs from many other vibes in that it was originally designed with ice fishing in mind, not just casting.
These vibrations have a greater specific weight than similar-sized analogues, which, without a doubt, has a positive effect on the nuances of using these interesting lures.
Another recognizable feature is the top fin, which is made of a strong and flexible plastic to create additional vibrations on both vertical and horizontal retrieves.
As a "winter wobbler" the Bet-A-Vib demonstrates a fairly aggressive action when fished vertically.
Often, the most effective is the simple monotonous animation, i.e. the movement of the lure up-and-down with almost no pauses.
When planning, the deviation from the vertical axis is not very large, which is convenient when fishing in a confined space, cluttered with underwater vegetation, snags and other obstacles that can cause a snag.
In addition, a slight deviation is relevant when catching pike and large perch in winter, and especially in the middle of winter, when a precise and aggressive presentation of the lure is required.
When it reaches the end of its trajectory, Bet-A-Vib instantly turns around and returns to the original vertical.
Bet-A-Vib is no less successful for winter fishing for pond trout.
To meet her whims, you can choose from two modifications: with a sound capsule (NS – NanoSound) or without it (SL – Silent).
It is also noted that the Bet-A-Vib can provoke a passive pike to strike, which does not react even to a live bait.
When casting, the Bet-A-Vib shows distance and accuracy.
This wobbler is easy to understand and not capricious, it works well with both monofilament and braided lines of even large diameters.
For catching pike, perch, bream, or rudd, in addition to a steady action, the "step" is also effective, sometimes with "chirping" on the bottom.
If you are fishing in snaggy areas, you can change the front treble to a double, which will reduce the chances of getting snagged.
Among the lures of its class, the Bet-A-Vib is one of the most durable and, as a result, one of the most effective.
It can be used with equal success in both relatively shallow and fairly deep areas.
All models are equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young layabouts are sitting on the necks of elderly parents.
The "golden youth" are clearly slackers in the majority, unable to do anything and not knowing anything.
A well-fed life leads to idleness.
Perhaps Mishustin was referring to this substantial part of the population.
You must be joking.
I have never seen a pair of shoes in this store that I would want to buy.
What long-term wear are you writing about?
These shoes are made of fake leather.
Well, if it lasts one season, that's good.
Zenden is on the same level as Kuyt.
I went in a couple of times, had a look around and understood that there was nothing to do in them.
Libya reported 7,000 Russian mercenaries
More than 7,000 mercenaries from the private military company (PMC) Wagner are in Libya.
Khaled al-Mishri, Chairman of the Supreme State Council of the Republic, announced this on Sunday, December 12.
“Currently, there are more than 7,000 PMC Wagner mercenaries in Libya.
They also have airplanes.
They are also digging trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 fighter jets at the Ghardabiya air base (which is also used as a civilian airport in Sirte)," Anadolu quotes him as saying.
Khaled al-Mishri also pointed out that the Russian mercenaries are "trying to take over" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
Remain present
According to the publication’s source, Moscow was looking for a country to maintain its presence in North Africa and “settled in Libya”.
Wagner has been in Libya since 2019, using the airbase and port in Sirte, as well as the airbase in Jufra, the agency notes.
Russian authorities officially deny that the Wagner PMC receives support from the Kremlin.
Where else can mercenaries be found?
According to the agency, “Wagner” is allegedly operating in nine African countries: the Central African Republic, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training for local forces, personal protection for leaders, and protection of energy facilities.
In exchange for these services, Wagner’s subsidiaries receive certain privileges and licenses to use mineral resources and natural resources, as well as to supply weapons, technologies and military services to these countries”, the article says.
According to the media, the "Wagnerists" supposedly fought in Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan, and the Central African Republic.
This group is not listed in the law enforcement agencies or in the register of legal entities, and its fighters are absent from the roll-call lists of the personnel.
This company is under U.S. sanctions.
We remind you that earlier the ambassadors of 27 EU countries approved the restrictions against “Wagner”.
This decision is expected to be approved by the Council of the European Union on 13 December.
The situation in Libya
The Libyan High State Council is in fact the second chamber of parliament with consultative functions, dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
This body has repeatedly called for the single day of voting for the election of members of parliament and the head of state to be postponed from 24 December at least until February 2022.
"Less than two weeks remain until the election, and the chances of it taking place on time are rapidly dwindling," the material notes.
In this context, the Libyan High Electoral Commission has postponed indefinitely the announcement of the final list of candidates, reports the Sky News Arabia channel.
Foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see more successes than failures in the country’s foreign policy, while 29% believe that failures predominate.
"Examples of success - "protected and restored peace in Syria", "the decision on Nord Stream 2", "frightened the whole world that we have powerful weapons", "we took Crimea".
The main failures are "conflict with Ukraine," "confrontation with western countries," and "isolation from the world," says the study by the Public Opinion Foundation.
The government of Dubai has completely abandoned paper record-keeping - all government services have also become only digital
The Dubai government has announced a complete move away from paper-based administration to digital technologies.
All state services to the public will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This is reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new phase of digitalization of all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully paperless government," said Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, Crown Prince of the emirate and Chairman of the Executive Council of Dubai, on Saturday.
Now, the internal and external document flow in all government institutions in Dubai will be carried out only in digital form through special information platforms.
The innovation affected all sectors without exception: healthcare, utilities, the police, municipal authorities, courts, and so on. Many commercial structures have also joined the government's initiative.
The transition to e-government and digitalization of document management began in Dubai in 2018.
In that time, authorities say, 336 million sheets of paper have been saved, which equates to 14 million hours of human labour and $353.8 million in monetary terms.
Earlier, Moscow Mayor Sergei Sobyanin stated that electronic services save citizens two days a year.
Dana, well, about the dates of birth and how old the child is, this is already dementia, about the class and group in the kindergarten too.
Well, I don't believe that such louts exist.
And if they do exist, they obviously don’t care about anything, including family.
My mother, her two brothers and grandparents lived at 3 Vladimirskaya, on the first floor without bars.
First they knocked on the door, then they knocked on the window, then they decided not to be polite, broke the window and got in, but the grandfather had a baseball bat, which they received.
These people knew for sure that there was someone in the house...
Turkey's car production, exports fall below 2020 levels
Turkey's car production and exports slumped sharply in November amid the lira's devaluation.
As a result, the industry's figures for the 11 months were worse than last year's result, reports Bloomberg, citing data from the Turkish Automotive Manufacturers Association.
According to the association, 115,000 cars were released from factories in Turkey in November, which is 20% less than the year before.
Around 75.9 thousand cars were exported, which is more than 25% less than last year’s figure.
And if at the end of the first 10 months of this year the automotive sector of Turkey demonstrated positive dynamics compared to the previous year, then at the end of the 11 months of 2021 the production of cars turned out to be already 0.3% worse than the previous year’s figure.
The reason for such a fall was the sharp depreciation of the Turkish lira, which in November depreciated by 29% against the dollar.
This led to a fall in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 MSMEs received a credit payment deferral in 2021
The First Deputy Prime Minister, Alikhan Smailov, spoke about the situation with the provision of benefits for small and medium-sized businesses, a correspondent for the Kazinform news agency reports.
“According to the information of the Republic of Kazakhstan Agency for Regulation and Supervision of the Financial Market, in the current year, in accordance with the instruction of the Head of State of April 1, 2021, the Order of the Chairman of the Agency of April 9, 2021, No. 127 “On the Approval of the Procedure for the Provision of Payment Deferrals for Loans of Small and Medium-Sized Businesses” was adopted”, - Alikhan Smailov wrote in his response to the deputy’s request.
He reminded that the procedure for deferring loan repayments provided for banks and organizations engaged in microfinance to defer loan repayments for loans issued before April 1, 2021 to MSMEs, including sole proprietors, during the period from April 1 to June 30, 2021.
The deferral period was between 30 and 90 days at the discretion of the SME subject.
The borrower may have specified a different payment deferral period in the loan application.
During the deferment period for the borrower, the enforcement of claims, the notification of the need to pay off the overdue debt, and the collection of commissions and other payments by the creditor were suspended," the Deputy Prime Minister noted.
In 2021, 603 SME borrowers applied for loan payment deferrals to second-level banks, of which 553 SME borrowers received payment deferrals for a total of 9.7 billion tenge.
131 MSMEs submitted applications for deferment, of which 95 MSMEs were granted deferment for a total of 105.8 million tenge," concluded A. Smailov.
Pulmonologist Puryasev suggested that people with a weak immune system are able to easily cope with the "Omicron" strain
The doctor suggested that people with a weakened immune system may be able to tolerate it better than those with a strong immune response
Pulmonologist Sergey Puryasev explained why the omicron variant of the coronavirus could be dangerous.
The reason is to be found in the conditions under which the virus was born.
Scientists believe that "okmiron" developed in the body of an HIV-infected or immunocompromised person.
That is, the mutation did not encounter any resistance from the immune system.
As a result, it is more aggressive.
Because there was no response from the immune system, it became very quick.
Apparently, there are more of these spike proteins, thorns, than should be there, and their antibodies have not been cut down during mutations, says pulmonologist Sergey Puryasev.
A doctor suggested that people with a weakened immune system may tolerate “omicron” better than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong immune response to anything, to any infection, is not always a good thing.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is exactly what happens with pneumococcal infections, when young people in their 30s die, and old people in their 60s get over it with a cough.
The immune response is wild in young people, it is completely irrational: there, where you could only wave your finger, it hits like a cannon on a sparrow - concluded Sergey Puryasev.
The doctor also reminded that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the most unpleasant of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial and viral.
If the first is treated very successfully and quickly, in the second case it is often possible to only treat the symptoms - all hope is on the body.
The first sign of developing pneumonia will be the beginning of intoxication of the body - this is a temperature, weakness, malaise.
Then come the respiratory symptoms: difficulty breathing, a sore throat, a cough.
Pain on the right or left side, as well as abdominal pain, can also indicate a developing problem.
Meanwhile, in Russia, they may start vaccinating the younger generation aged 12 to 18 by the end of the year.
The virologist and head of the MIPT genome engineering laboratory, Pavel Volchkov, noted that this category is very actively affected by COVID-19.
For children who go to school, the number of contacts is at its maximum.
This is the most socially active group, just like the children in kindergartens, said Pavel Volchkov, a virologist and head of the Laboratory of Genome Engineering at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology, to Moscow 24.
A huge thank you to the author for this article.
I was happy to refresh my memories...
Teath-In.
Back in the 1970s and 1980s, no dance floor was complete without the music of this group.
And at home, when they got together with friends, they would dance to their music.
Immunologists have come up with a hypothesis as to why people with obesity become victims of COVID
The researchers looked at fat tissue left over from bariatric surgeries and discovered that fat cells, known as adipocytes, can be infected by the coronavirus.
Immune cells located in the fatty tissue, the macrophages, were also infected, and showed a strong inflammatory response.
Researchers also examined the fat tissue of patients who died from COVID-19 and found particles of the coronavirus in the fat surrounding various organs.
HIV and influenza viruses have been known to hide in fat tissue, using it as a reservoir, in an attempt to evade the immune system.
It is likely that SARS-CoV-2 is also capable of this.
Biologist spoke about the reasons for the appearance of dementia
The candidate of biological sciences, Semyon Golosheikin, named the reasons for the appearance of dementia and told about ways to prevent it in an interview with the Sputnik radio station.
According to the WHO, more than 55 million people suffer from this disease.
The syndrome is manifested by a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, a person with the syndrome finds it difficult to navigate even in familiar surroundings.
Golosheykin noted that the most common causes of dementia are neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression and alcoholism.
At a behavioural level, factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive engagement may play a role," he said.
The development of dementia is also affected by harmful habits – smoking, alcohol abuse, sleep disorders, and a sedentary lifestyle.
Among the first signs, the expert noted forgetfulness, inability to concentrate, and a decrease in the level of abstract thinking.
"There is a debate that hearing loss may be an early sign of Alzheimer's or a risk factor for it," the biologist added.
To prevent the onset of the disease, the WHO recommends maintaining a sufficient level of physical activity, training cognitive skills and abilities that require the involvement of memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the department of neurology, neurosurgery and medical genetics of the Federal State Budgetary Educational Institution of Higher Education Russian National Research Medical University named after N.I. Pirogov.
N.I. Pirogov, head of the Department of Cognitive Disorders of the Federal Center for the Brain and Neurotechnology, Anna Bogolepova, spoke about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt has returned about 30,000 artifacts illegally taken out of the country
Over the past 10 years, the Cairo government has managed to return about 30,000 artifacts that were illegally smuggled out of the country.
This was announced on Saturday, 11 December, in the broadcast of the Al-Hayat channel by the chief inspector of the Department of Returned Antiquities of the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, Shaaban Abdel Gawad.
Since 2011, the Egyptian state has managed to return 29,300 artifacts.
This year alone, 5,300 artifacts from ancient Egyptian civilization were discovered at the Museum of the Bible in Washington," he said.
Abdel Gawad clarified that all of the smuggled artifacts are registered in the archives.
Currently, department employees are working on their return to Egypt.
In particular, the experts “monitor auctions all over the world and online sales” through foreign and Egyptian sites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector said that after being returned, the cultural treasures are restored and then put on display in museums.
According to him, one of the returned artifacts was an ancient human skeleton found in Belgium, which is now part of the collection of the National Museum of Egyptian Civilization in Cairo.
In 2020, the Egyptian authorities appealed to Interpol for help in finding a bust of Pharaoh Tutankhamun sold at auction in London.
The auction house Christie’s held an auction on July 4, at which the 3,000-year-old bust was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million roubles).
This was met with discontent from Egypt.
The Egyptian side also claims the artwork was illegally taken out of Karnak Temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
Tutankhamun's head, depicted as the sun god Amun, has been held in a private collection and has not been offered for sale since 1985.
How the relic got to Europe is unknown.
Egypt has in recent years been actively pursuing the repatriation of antiquities that have been illegally removed from the country at different times.
According to the authorities, 95% of smuggled antiquities are the result of archaeological excavations by “black diggers”.
"Crimean Tatars are not considered" - and this is correct, because Crimean Tatars (232,000) are a separate people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, then only 42,000 people - that's how many Kazan Tatars live in Crimea (see the census).
The Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
The only thing that unites them is the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants access to staff's personal mobile phones
Credit Suisse is requiring its staff to give the bank access to their personal mobile devices, Financial Times reports.
The fact is that in Europe and the United States, the Swiss bank does not issue its employees corporate communication devices, instead offering a discount on purchasing a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner – a telecommunications operator.
Under current rules, banks can view information on corporate devices issued to their employees as they are used to conduct business with colleagues or clients.
The bank has the right to check mobile devices in extreme cases - for example, if an employee used it for a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now, after many staff have moved to remote working, the bank wants to extend the rule to all devices used for work purposes.
According to the newspaper, the bank’s management has set a deadline by which employees must familiarize themselves with the new rule.
Credit Suisse has not officially commented on the new requirement.
Sontelle Vivre Dual royal 70x200 mattress.
In the center of the Vivre Dual royal mattress is a quality and durable block of high autonomous TFK 18 springs.
The natural coconut mattress layers add firmness, the zoned latex better distributes the load, the latex with added Aloe Vera provides hygiene of the sleeping place, and the relief foam relaxes.
The mattress is of symmetrical medium hardness and high height (30 cm).
The product is delivered packaged in a tight roll and is ready to use in a short time after unpacking.
The cover is made from strong knitted fabric with stitching on the comfort layer.
The cover fabric does not crease or stretch over time.
Part 4
Sergei Yesenin’s last year of life, 1925, was productive in terms of creativity, but was the most difficult for the poet’s earthly existence and his “ego”.
He's already outside of any literary associations, he's done with imagism, he's on his own, but he's well-known, in demand, sometimes heavily criticized by critics, even maliciously, but the reading public is ready to carry him on their shoulders.
More than 60 poems were written in a year, many of them are real masterpieces, the cycle "Persian motifs" was completed, the poem "Anna Snegina" was written, 8 books were published, the collection "Soviet Rus'".
And the main success was at the end of June 1925, when Gosizdat signed a contract with Yesenin for the publication of his works in 3 volumes.
No contemporary of Sergey Alexandrovich has been honored in this way, he is the first!
Moreover, this promised very good money - according to the contract, the fee was 1000 roubles per month for 20 months (the factory director, for example, received 300 roubles per month, an engineer - 200).
Funds were needed more than ever that year.
Yesenin married Tolstoy's granddaughter, Sofia Tolstoy, he had to arrange his family life, provide for his sisters, Katya and Sasha, as well as his mother.
It seemed like life was getting back on track, there was something to be happy about, but for him, everything was mostly in dark tones, as if the nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published posthumously) had materialized:
My friend, my friend,
I'm very, very ill.
I don't know where this pain came from.
Either the wind is whistling
Over an empty, deserted field,
Is it, like a forest in September,
Alcohol is a brain drain.
Many acquaintances noted that Yessenin had lost a lot of weight, looks bad, and is obviously ill.
More and more frequent are the tantrums and nervous breakdowns.
And the reason is probably not just because of the alcoholism...
In fact, if such a diagnosis - alcoholism - was given to Sergei Alexandrovich by anyone, no reliable documents remain.
For example, those from May 1923, when Yesenin, at the insistence of his fourth wife, the American Isadora Duncan, was recovering his health in a clinic near Paris under the care of Professor Petr Gannushkin (Yesenin will return to him two years later, already in Moscow).
However, there are plenty of testimonies about the poet’s drunkenness, scandals on this subject, and arrests – scattered across dozens of memoirs.
Since the early 1920s, the poet's horrible romance with the green snake has developed rapidly.
At the end of the summer of 1923, Yesenin lived for a short time with a friend, the imagist Ivan Starcev.
It's surprising, but Yessenin, despite his fairly good income, never had his own home in Moscow or Saint Petersburg; he lived in rented apartments, hotels, or with acquaintances.
Starzhevsky remembers:
"He only came to sleep, and most of the time he was in an insane, drunk state.
Once, returning at four in the morning, Yessenin fell on the landing...
As I fell, I scratched my face and wheezed.
When he came to, he began to cough constantly, spraying the entire sheet with blood..."
And Yessenin himself, after a trip to Europe and the United States (there was a dry law in the United States at that time, but Duncan took a decent supply of alcohol with her) confessed:
"I saw nothing there except pigs and streets...
By the end of it, I couldn't even remember people's names...
Well, and he drank, of course...
And I drank because I was overcome with homesickness."
The Pirelli (Pirelli) Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V tire
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tire, based on a high-strength rubber and silica mixture, ensures long-term effective operation, even wear, and resistance to loads.
The linear tread pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre, which forms the ribs, ensures low rolling resistance and directional stability.
Four deep channels effectively evacuate water, dirt from the contact patch of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tire, suppress skidding and aquaplaning.
The 3D-shaped lamellas enhance the grip on a slippery road, in snow and on ice.
The large shoulder blocks of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter enhance the tyre's transverse grip when cornering, increase traction and shorten the braking distance.
The small grooves and notches conduct heat away.
The Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom 100x195 mattress
The Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom is a modern interpretation of a budget model in the premium class.
The base of the mattress is a block of independent double Duet springs.
A smaller, softer spring is inserted inside the large spring.
This allows for an even distribution of weight across the mattress.
On both sides, the mattress is supplemented with a filler - artificial latex.
This is an alternative to natural latex but it is denser and less expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort effect of the mattress.
Synthetic latex is hypoallergenic, it doesn't absorb moisture and dust.
The mattress is ideal for couples with a large weight difference (up to 30 kilograms).
Because of the "smart" springs here, there is no effect of a wave, when the light partner slides to the side of the heavy one.
The pleasant, soft-to-the-touch cover made of practical jacquard Sense is lined with a layer of synthepon.
Natural fabrics do not build up static electricity.
It is possible to make this model of mattress in a rolled-up version (vacuum roll-packing).
Now, his son is almost 16, and he hasn't been tormented by the desire to misbehave for a long time.
All of his energy is focused on choosing what he will do for a living.
He's far more responsible than I was at his age or my husband, who periodically had problems with the law up until his wedding.
The father cares for his young daughter.
And he loves, as Lermontov wrote, "in a strange way."
Why did the girl cry during the exam when she hadn’t failed it yet?
Why didn't he tell his daughter it wasn't school.
Well, it will have a tail.
So what?
They'll retake it.
This is known to millions of students.
What is this talk about, anyway?
Poland's foreign ministry says Belarus is using migrants as 'weapon' against EU
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus is using migrants as a "weapon"
The deputy foreign minister of Poland, Pawel Jablonski, expressed the opinion that the president of Belarus, Alexander Lukashenko, used refugees as "weapons" against the European Union and intends to return to such an "operation" next year.
The deputy head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs made a corresponding statement in an interview with the Australian Financial Review newspaper.
According to Yablonsky, the sanctions against Belarus have temporarily "stopped Lukashenko," but he is "actively looking for new ways."
The Polish official is also convinced that illegal migrants will now be used as a weapon "in many parts of the world".
As the kp.ru website wrote, earlier, the European Union implemented the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
It targeted 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
In Europe, they have stated their readiness to continue to expand restrictive measures against the republic "if the situation in the country does not improve".
In response, Minsk imposed a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that had previously decided to impose sanctions against Belarus.
Clothing cover, 60x100 cm, spunbond, blue.
In order for your clothing to last, it is necessary to care for it properly.
Proper storage will help extend its life and maintain its attractive appearance.
A garment bag will help us with this!
Benefits.
Using a garment bag, you can save a lot of space.
This is especially true if you have a lot of things and a small closet.
Well-groomed exterior.
No more dresses, cardigans and skirts hanging out of place.
The neat covers allow you to sort your clothes and hide them from prying eyes.
For people who use a rack instead of a regular closet, this is the best option.
The cover provides reliable protection for the clothing from dust and dirt, insects, mechanical damage or possible fading.
It does not allow clothing to change shape during long-term storage, and prevents creases from forming.
Features of clothing covers.
The special material will allow your clothing to "breathe".
With proper care, the service life of such a cover is not limited.
In them you can store not only clothes, but also blankets, pillows, bedding.
The case is "sealed" with a strong zipper.
It's important to remember!
Prepare items for long-term storage in advance: clean them, iron them.
Choose a cover that is the right size: items should not be folded over at the bottom.
It is not recommended to put several bulky items in one case at once: they can get crushed.
If you value order and tidiness, care for your things, want to keep them and extend their service life, order a garment cover.
Visit our large catalog and choose the item in the color and size you need at a great price!
"Not a hat for Senya": when a velvet jacket makes a man a laughing stock
Velvet blazers dominated the social scene in 2021.
Perhaps the first to announce his new fashion choice was Daniel Craig.
Back in September, at the premiere of the film No Time to Die, he appeared in a velvet magenta jacket and the traditional "Bond" bow tie.
Following in his footsteps, Prince William has twice broken the royal dress code, first donning a green velvet jacket to the Earthshot Prize awards ceremony and then choosing a more classic option for the Royal Variety Performance charity event.
A couple of weeks ago, the trend was picked up by Lionel Messi.
The footballer came to collect his seventh “Golden Ball” in a velvet Dolce & Gabbana jacket.
By the way, his sons were dressed the same.
AliExpress has already noted growing demand for velvet men's jackets in Russia.
According to the service's analysts, according to Gazeta.Ru, their sales have increased by 1.4 times.
The most popular are warm velvet jackets with a lining and a fitted silhouette, the main colors are dark beige, burgundy, dark blue and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is from 3,000 to 6,000 roubles. At the same time, men prefer to buy only jackets; they choose velvet suit sets less often.
You can buy them not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, velvet jackets are presented in almost all brands this season - both Brioni and Paul Smith and Etro and Saint Laurent.
The most desirable is the Gucci model, in which the brand ambassador, Jared Leto, appeared at one of the premieres of the film "House of Gucci".
When choosing jackets from expensive brands, you can be sure that the velvet is made of silk.
Thanks to a special method of interweaving the threads, a dense fabric with a fluffy outer texture and a smooth inner side is obtained.
The more affordable options are made from cotton or polyamide, but as a result, they don't last as long.
The Lamoda fashion expert Ilya Vakhonshin warns that, in the case of a velvet jacket, the most important thing is not its model or style, but its appropriateness.
"Velvet demands evening light, so such a jacket is ideal if you're going to a party or a formal event," explains Vakhshtein. "It will also be suitable for those occasions where the dress code is "Black Tie" or "Creative Black Tie".
Another important criterion that allows you to make a choice in favor of a velvet jacket is the status of its buyer.
"A man in a velvet jacket, first of all, should acquire the right advanced crowd with enough money," the authors of the Telegram channel on men's fashion "Handsome Brammell" believe. "Owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the caste of those people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to the related social events, where a dress code is always specified.
Ilya Vakhonshin proposes to combine a velvet jacket with similar smart things: classic trousers with pleats, plain shirts, silk ties, loafers with tassels, and cufflinks.
Too simple and ordinary things will look out of place.
Fashion experts from "Beau Brummell" are sure that it would be inappropriate for a regular employee to appear in a velvet jacket at a corporate event, but if we are talking about "a manager who is in charge of this event, then - yes, he would be in theme with such a thing."
If the lower-ranking employee has a goal of moving up in the company's complex hierarchy or winning financial bonuses, then it is better not to wear a velvet jacket.
Management will surely appreciate the phrase “not a hat for Senya”, the editors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion believe.
Very ambivalent feelings about the voice.
It's an unnatural timbre, so laboured.
And it has absolutely nothing to do with the sweet face of a young girl.
To be honest, I don't understand the admiration of those around me.
But from the bottom of my heart, I wish you good luck in life!
It all comes down to money - alternative energy is well lobbied, i.e. bribed.
Billion-dollar investments.
Are they sad?
No, the price of electricity has gone up.
Traditional energy is also not in the red - gas, oil, and coal were bought cheaper than they are being sold now.
There is a wild demand for fuel.
A penny drips.
And who is in the passage then?
As usual, I was just a regular customer.
Do the problems of the Indians touch the sheriff?
Therefore, one should not consider Western politicians to be idiots for “sleeping through” the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a not-bad bribe.
I didn't see a single beautiful person in the photos in the article.
It's just mediocrity within average passengers.
Perhaps, if such characters are so sure of their beauty that they decide to show it to the whole carriage, it is unlikely that anyone will sit down with them.
But only due to the mental illness and ignorance of such "beauties (and handsome men)", but certainly not because of their appearance.
Kazbek, "a slave who recognizes his slave status and fights against it, is a revolutionary.
The slave who does not recognize his slavery and wallows in a silent, unconscious, and wordless life of a slave is simply a slave.
The slave who drools as he smugly describes the delights of the slave life and extols the good and kind master is a lackey, a sycophant."
An immunologist has stated that revaccination in 4-5 months will help protect against the “omicron” coronavirus strain
Revaccination after four-five months can protect against the new variant of the coronavirus infection "omicron".
This statement was made by immunologist Nikolai Kryuchkov, who called a six-month vaccination, taking into account the emergence of a new strain, "a very long period"
"With previous strains, such a period was normal, but now it is best to conduct the procedure after five months, and for people with chronic diseases - after four," said the expert, calling for revaccination to be carried out in parallel with the vaccination campaign.
Krupchkov also noted that early revaccination provides a good titer of neutralizing antibodies.
"If a person has received two vaccinations and a booster, or has recovered and been vaccinated, or has been vaccinated and recovered, then he has "hybrid immunity", that is, there are a lot of antibodies and enough neutralizing ones," the expert clarified.
G7 warns Russia of 'massive consequences' if it invades Ukraine
The G7 countries (the United Kingdom, Germany, Italy, Canada, the United States, France and Japan) have published a statement following the meeting of foreign ministers in Liverpool.
It emphasises that "military aggression" by Russia against Ukraine "will have huge consequences and will be very expensive" for Moscow, but no specific measures are described in the document.
"We, the Foreign Ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States of America, and the High Representative of the European Union, are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
Next, the ministers call on Russia to “de-escalate, use diplomatic channels, and comply with its international commitments on military transparency”, as US President Biden said during a video call with Russian President Putin on 7 December.
"We reaffirm our support for the efforts of France and Germany in the Normandy format to achieve full implementation of the Minsk agreements in order to settle the conflict in eastern Ukraine," the foreign ministers of the G7 also state.
Any use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited by international law.
Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have massive consequences and severe costs," they warned.
We reaffirm our unwavering commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Ukraine and the right of any sovereign state to determine its own future.
We welcome the restrained position of Ukraine.
We will intensify our cooperation on our common and comprehensive response," the statement said.
Earlier in the day, the head of British diplomacy, Elizabeth Truss, said that Russia would face "serious consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
She said the meeting showed a "united voice from the G7 countries, which account for 50% of global GDP, and which have made it very clear that the invasion of Ukraine will have huge consequences for Russia."
Pfizer vaccine found to be 32 times less effective against omicron variant
The effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the omicron strain of the coronavirus is 32 times lower in comparison with other types of the disease.
This conclusion was reached by scientists from the University of Hong Kong and the Chinese University of Hong Kong, according to South China Morning Post (SCMP).
The vaccine was found to be less effective on the basis of a study of antiviral activity in citizens who received two doses of the COVID-19 drug.
"We see that most people had high levels of antiviral activity against the original Sars-CoV-2, but this ability was greatly reduced against the Omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris said.
At the same time, scientists stressed that vaccination remains the most reliable way to protect against a severe course of the disease when infected with the coronavirus.
Previously, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of the coronavirus pandemic, taking into account the influence of the omicron strain on it.
The authors of the study concluded that the omicron strain could cause a new wave of virus circulation and an increase in mortality if additional measures are not taken.
Ukraine’s Defense Minister Accuses Germany of Blocking NATO Arms Deliveries to Kyiv
The head of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine, Aleksey Reznikov, accused the government of former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking Kiev’s acquisition of lethal weapons within NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on Dec. 12, Reznikov recalled that last month, Germany vetoed Ukraine’s purchase of anti-sniper systems and rifles for shooting down drones.
At the same time, it is noted that Berlin later softened its position on rifles, recognizing them as non-lethal weapons.
According to the defense minister, Kiev intends to acquire the above-mentioned weapons within the framework of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, this refers to the United States, the United Kingdom, Lithuania, and France.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the position of the new German government led by Chancellor Olaf Scholz on the issue of allowing arms shipments to Ukraine remains unclear.
Earlier on Sunday, Ukraine’s ambassador to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, expressed the opinion that Kyiv should not wait for weapons deliveries from Berlin under Chancellor Scholz.
According to him, the previous German leadership explained its refusal to provide weapons by the risk of developing a military escalation of the conflict in Donbass, despite the "occupation of Russia" of a part of Ukrainian territory.
The diplomat is convinced that Germany will maintain the same “illogical” position under the new chancellor.
In August, Ukrainian leader Vladimir Zelensky said that Kiev expects assistance from Berlin in equipping the naval fleet.
Ukraine is counting on Germany to be “a partner of Ukraine in the technical sense”, the president added.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, co-chairman of the German Green Party, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he called for the sale of defensive weapons to Kyiv.
Sergei Nosov 2, no, bad eyesight has nothing to do with it.
Type "I" instead of "E"?
Allowing the use of a lot of commas?
So write И instead of Е.
No, you are an illiterate person.
And for a philologist, this is a disgrace.
Fishing game set: e/f light, sound, includes game board, 2 fishing rods, 5 figures, 3AA batteries not included, box.
The electrified children's fishing is a fun and educational toy for children.
While playing, the little one will train their fine motor skills, develop dexterity, accuracy, and attention.
As soon as you turn the toy on, 5 miniature fish will begin to swim around in the simulated pond to a cheerful melody.
The child's task is to catch them all on the hook!
The game can be played alone or in pairs: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy requires 3 x 1.5V AA batteries (not included).
The size of the playing field (LxWxH) is 21x17x4 cm.
The item is made of plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
The winners of the Arsenyev Prize were named in Moscow - Russian Gazette
A solemn award ceremony for the winners of the third season of the All-Russian Literary Prize "Far East" named after
V. K. Arsenyev passed in Moscow.
As reported on the award’s Instagram page, a total of 89 applications were received by the organising committee this season.
63 have made the cut.
The leaders in the number of works submitted are Primorsky and Khabarovsky krais - 13 and 11 applications, respectively.
More than 60 works were nominated for the prize in three categories: "Long prose", "Short prose", and "Prose for children".
Nine works made it onto the shortlist – three in each category.
Alexander Filkin (Primorye Territory) won in the “Long Prose” category for his book “The Inscription on the Gospel”.
The prize for the winner was presented by the Deputy Prime Minister, the Plenipotentiary Representative of the President of the Russian Federation in the Far Eastern Federal District, Yuri Trutnev.
In the ‘Short Prose’ category, Lyubov Bezbakh (Sakhalin Region) was recognised as the best for her work, ‘The Whisper of Night Rain’.
She received the award from the hands of the Russian Minister for the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Alexey Chekunkov.
In the children’s prose category, the prize was awarded to the Trans-Baikal writer Nina Belomestnova and her “Golden Thread”.
The author was awarded by the screenwriter, writer, Candidate of Philological Sciences and Chairman of the Jury of the Prize Andrei Gelasimov.
All the winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
We remind you that within the framework of the "Far East" award, the authors of the best works on the Far Eastern theme are awarded.
The main goal of the prize is not only to reward the winners and tell about contemporary authors, but also to attract cultural interest to the Far East, as a territory of priority development in the 21st century.
Novels, novellas, collections of short stories or short stories, as well as non-fiction prose and memoirs can be nominated.
The place of residence of the author does not matter, the main thing is to write in the Russian language.
The official website of the prize: https://премияарсеньева.рф/.
Frying pan, d=22 cm, with handle, colour dark marble, 4278884.
The Kukmara "marble" cookware is made from cast aluminium and is coated with an innovative anti-stick marble coating based on water, reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
Features of the "Marble" dishware series.
The significant thickness of the walls and bottom prevents deformation of the hull, guarantees durability, and provides the necessary strength of the coating.
The high-performance, non-stick marble coating is water-based and reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
Eco-friendly, PFOA-free (perfluorooctanoic acid) non-stick coating.
Ideal heat distribution across the entire surface of the cookware, and long-term heat retention.
The ability to use a minimum amount of fat.
The non-stick marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exceptional durability of the coating during use.
Small scratches and minor abrasions on the surface of the pot do not affect the properties of the non-stick coating and the durability of the cookware.
The products do not burn and retain their flavor.
The ability to prepare tasty and healthy food without the addition of oil, like on hot stones.
The thickened bottom is up to 6 mm thick.
It has high thermal conductivity and is ergonomic.
Ease of cleaning.
It is suitable for all types of hobs, except induction.
It can be washed in the dishwasher.
The wall consists of 6 layers, the inner coating is "marble".
A high-performance, water-based, non-stick coating reinforced with particles of super-hard minerals.
Reinforced soil layer.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
A cast aluminium case with a thickness of up to 6 mm.
The outer non-stick coating is “marble”.
The Kukmara cookware will allow any housewife to turn the ordinary cooking process into a pleasant and easy task.
Years... a long time ago, I did the same renovation.
Combined the living room with the kitchen.
It's a three-room apartment.
There was.
Of course, the project, permit, new technical passport, everything according to the law.
They made a bookcase and large walk-in closet in the hallway.
They bricked up the door to the kitchen, and a lot of space was created.
After almost 10 years of living in this apartment, we have never regretted our decision.
From mistakes, they installed a steep shower cabin instead of a bath.
I regret it a hundred times!
I only recently realized that I love rum.
But I have not yet discovered the wonderful world of rum, apart from Bacardi and Captain Morgan.
What else would you recommend, and where would you start this wonderful acquaintance?
I've had it too.
I won't get vaccinated.
He came to Chernomorskoye for ‘rehabilitation’.
Only the weather didn't work out...
The houses are pretty, but normal birds won't nest in the bright houses because they attract too much attention, ask ornithologists.
In addition, the paint and other chemicals will deter the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I will definitely try it.
And what does Japan have to do with it?
Thanks for the recipe.
And what kinds of apples should I use for this recipe?
It's really delicious.
I add a little bit more onion and a green apple.
Try it.
Recently, the zombie box said that the production of automobiles is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A table appeared on the screen, showing which country produces what percentage of these semiconductors (presumably chips-microcontrollers).
Russia was not on this list.
That's how it is!
In the United States, with their expensive workforce, it is profitable, but in Russia, it is not profitable!
And my mother-in-law tormented me.
I feel sorry for her, she's not here with us.
If I had seen good in her, things could have been different.
But apart from hatred, gossip, and scandals, there is nothing else to remember.
I feel sorry for her, she lived her life in anger.
"Mercedes" has protested the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The German team, Mercedes, whose pilot Lewis Hamilton finished second in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, behind the Red Bull driver Max Verstappen, filed a protest against the final result of the race, reports the press service of Formula 1.
"Mercedes" considers that "Formula 1" rules 48.12 and 48.8 were violated during the race.
In the first case, the German team is challenging the decision of the judges to return the round racers to one lap behind the leaders.
According to the second, Verstappen passed Hamilton before the permitted "restart" zone.
We will add that now the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Verstappen passed Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 world championship, is preliminary, when the Mercedes protests will be considered is not known.
G7 warns Russia of consequences for invasion of Ukraine
G7 foreign ministers warned of "serious consequences" for Russia if it continued military aggression against Ukraine, according to a final statement by the parties.
The participants in the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of Russian armed forces near the country's borders.
"Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine would have massive consequences and severe costs in response," the statement published on the UK government website said.
The G7 foreign ministers and the EU's top diplomat noted that they were "united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric against Ukraine."
British Foreign Secretary, Elizabeth Truss, at a press conference in Liverpool, warned of "serious consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
We've made it clear that any invasion will have massive consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to abandon its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Earlier at the Liverpool summit, the G7 foreign ministers agreed that in order to resolve the crisis due to the buildup of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine, the parties need to return to the negotiating table.
We are talking about negotiations in the “Normandy format”.
The North Atlantic Alliance has also come out in favour of a dialogue on Ukraine in the “Normandy format”.
Russian Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said that by calling on Russia and Ukraine to return to the negotiating table, the G7 countries "have signed their inability to take responsibility for their own mistakes."
Homsu Diamond belt bag.
The Diamond belt bag is perfect for sports, travel or just going for a walk.
It is convenient to take with you, it is roomy, made of durable and lightweight fabric.
The main compartment opens with a zipper, which can be done easily even on the go.
The stylish and bright design is perfect for those ladies who really have a fine taste in accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19x12x7 cm and a belt length of 40 to 60 cm, allowing it to accommodate various items, from a passport to a mobile phone.
The material makes it easy to wash the belt bag using various household products.
For convenience, you can use a special size adjuster for the strap.
Methods of recovering money stolen through online stores have been revealed
There are several ways to get your money back from an online store that was stolen and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
This was revealed by information security experts in an interview with RBC.
For example, in order to reduce the risk of large losses in the event that a bank card falls into the hands of a criminal, it is recommended to store the main funds on a card or a bank account that is not used for online shopping.
Part of the savings can be put into a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend getting a separate card for online purchases.
If the money was stolen from purchases made in stores that do not use the 3D Secure protection technology, it is possible to initiate a refund procedure.
"According to the rules established by payment systems for unauthorized transactions carried out without the use of 3D Secure, liability is imposed on the participant in the payment chain who does not use this service," clarified a representative of Promsvyazbank.
An expert from the international payment provider Ecommpay, Artur Zaremba, emphasized that the buyer has the right to submit an application to the bank to dispute the fraudulent operation no later than 120 days after the purchase.
In addition, if the criminal used the card on online resources that do not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be disputed and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases, online stores will return the money to the customer if the order has not yet been sent for delivery.
On November 19, a member of the Public Chamber and director of the League for a Safe Internet, Ekaterina Mizulina, reported that only in 2021, 11,000 complaints were received regarding various cases of fraud: from the sale of counterfeit documents to the theft of personal data.
According to her, an effective solution in the current circumstances could be the creation of a single window for complaints about online fraudsters.
Scholz arrives in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
Newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz has arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis at the border with Belarus, judicial independence in Poland, the build-up of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
Although Scholz has stated his desire to maintain good relations between Germany and Poland for many years, the leaders of the two countries have made unambiguous expectations of each other.
Polish Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki has said he will call on Scholz to speak out against "Nord Stream 2," which is expected to deliver Russian gas to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
According to Morawiecki, Russia can use the gas pipeline against Europe as a means of political pressure.
In turn, Germany supported Poland's efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin has stated that it will assist Warsaw and Brussels in resolving this crisis.
Poland's justice system, however, remains a point of contention.
The European Court of Justice has fined Poland, finding that judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland has refused to pay the fine and its top court has ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
The new German government, sworn in on Wednesday, has not publicly committed to stopping work on the Nord Stream 2 pipeline in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine, despite calls from Poland and the United States.
U.S. officials have told members of Congress that they have reached an understanding with Germany to halt the pipeline if Russia invades Ukraine, a senior U.S. congressional aide said on Tuesday.
German officials did not confirm the reports, but Scholz warned of the consequences if Russia breaches Ukraine's border on Wednesday, and this position was confirmed by representatives of the G7 on Sunday.
Dmitry, pay closer attention.
The view out the window is the same, and the size of the window has not changed.
We removed the wall between the kitchen and the room, so the second window is partially visible.
Those who are in doubt are those who are not familiar with the original plan.
And I know such apartments very well, and I can see very clearly how it was remodelled.
Let everything be good for them.
It always surprises me when they write about means to clean sinks, toilets, windowsills, taps.
You wash them once a year on Easter, or something like that, which means you have to scrub them.
Just don't get dirty.
The Ministry of Digital Development wants to give writers residencies
The future Foundation for the Support of Russian Writers will be given federal property that was inherited from the Union of Writers of the USSR and the Literary Fund of the USSR.
A writer’s residence will be created on its basis, the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media, which will become the founder of the fund, reported to the “Parliamentary Gazette”.
The Ministry of Digital Development is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of a fund to support Russian writers.
The explanatory note specifies that the fund will be tasked with ensuring the targeted use and preservation of buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union of Writers and the Litfund.
“A significant number of immovable property objects, previously belonging to the Literary Fund of the USSR, have passed into the ownership of the Russian Federation, including objects located in the writers’ village of Peredelkino, the village of Komarovo in the Leningrad Region, and others”, the press service of the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media told Parlamentskaya Gazeta.
The draft decree stipulates that the Foundation’s charter must reflect the fact that it is "established for the purpose of supporting literary activities by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers".
“By ‘creating conditions for creative activity’ we mean creating writer’s residences based on the transferred property in different regions of Russia, in which there would be comfortable conditions for creativity,” the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media explained to our publication.
520 roubles for one sliced tomato?
A cheese tortilla is literally a slice of dough from a pack that costs 550 rubles.
Three pieces of fish in a measuring cup for 570...
No, it looks delicious, of course, but the price is just unreasonable.
It seems that all the rich people have gathered on Belorusskaya.
Doctors warn of danger of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19 and before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yartseva and Sergey Tokarev warned of the danger of the uncontrolled use of blood thinners after a COVID-19 infection and before vaccination against COVID-19.
The internist and immunologist, Irina Yartseva, said that independent prevention of the possible formation of blood clots after COVID-19 can provoke a stroke.
Yartseva explained that blood thinners are not prescribed to everyone, only if the patient was hospitalised, was in the hospital, and had complications.
The doctor prescribes an anticoagulant (a blood thinner that prevents the formation of clots) as needed.
She reported that currently there is a dark age - everyone is drinking anticoagulants for a long time and getting complications in the form of hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding in the brain) due to this.
The chief prophylactologist of the Urals Federal District, the scientific director of the Society of Specialists in Preventive Medicine, and a doctor of medical sciences, Sergey Tokarev, told URA.RU in an interview that Russians are currently often using anticoagulants in an unsystematic manner, and even before vaccination against the coronavirus infection.
According to Dr. Tokarev, citizens believe dubious advice on the Internet and start to self-medicate.
There are citizens who, a week before vaccination of their own free will, begin to take anticoagulants.
And during the preliminary examination before the vaccination, the doctors notice the bruises.
He emphasized that it is extremely dangerous to take any medication without determining the cause of any symptom.
Potatoes named a superfood to protect against high blood pressure
Research has shown that regular consumption of this common and affordable vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of developing cardiovascular disease.
Potatoes are in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and trace elements that promote the functioning of the internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving circulation and lowering cholesterol, reports the Semana portal.
Today, heart disease is the leading cause of premature death.
To improve the situation, it is not only necessary to undergo treatment, but also to eat properly.
One of the helpers in such a situation will be ordinary potatoes.
According to the scientists, this root vegetable contains a lot of vitamins B1, B3, B6, as well as vitamin C, which is very important for the body.
In addition, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, as well as riboflavin, folic acid, and pantothenic acid.
Micronutrients help the body's internal systems to work effectively.
Among other things, the root vegetable fights the natural age-related disorders in the body, contains a lot of fibre that is good for the digestive system.
If consumed regularly, it can prevent atherosclerosis and hypertension.
I had such a case.
A lady came to look at the apartment.
I came from another city to show her.
The listing included detailed photos and a description of the apartment.
She remained extremely dissatisfied, because there was no "fancy" kitchen and "fancy" balcony.
Aunt, apparently, has nothing to do, so she is looking at other people’s apartments, while people are wasting their time.
About 145,000 adolescents received the first component of the COVID-19 vaccine in Kazakhstan
Information has been published about the vaccination of adolescents, pregnant and breastfeeding women against COVID-19 in Kazakhstan, the Kazinform news agency reports, citing the Inter-Ministerial Commission on the Prevention of the Spread of COVID-19.
Twenty people have died from the coronavirus and pneumonia over the past day in Kazakhstan, 85 patients with the coronavirus are in a critical condition – the Ministry of Health of the Republic of Kazakhstan Most of the regions of Kazakhstan are in the "green zone" for the coronavirus
As of 11 December 2021, 181,037 people had received the first component of the Pfizer vaccine, and 14,580 had received the second component.
Of these, the first dose: teenagers - 144,613, pregnant women - 10,645, breastfeeding women - 25,779.
For the second dose, teenagers - 10,690, pregnant women - 1,141, breastfeeding women - 2,749.
The plumber who found money in the church wall will be paid $20,000
The plumber who found money in the wall of a church in the American state of Texas will receive a reward.
This is reported in a press release from the non-profit organization Crime Stoppers of Houston.
The incident took place at a large evangelical church in Lakewood, where Pastor Joel Osteen preaches that faithful Christians are in for wealth and prosperity.
In November 2021, a plumber, Justin Cooley, was repairing one of the church's toilets and discovered, under the insulation, thousands of packets of cash and checks.
He turned the find over to the church, he says, and didn't even get a thank you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, "You know, Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand what you've done and what you could have done," KPRC-TV quoted him as saying.
The find appears to be linked to a theft that took place at the Lakewood church seven years ago.
Then, about $200,000 in cash and $400,000 in the form of checks, which were stored in the church’s safe, disappeared.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer a loss.
Nevertheless, a reward of $25,000 was announced for information about the criminals.
Justin Cooley could not claim the amount as the prize had already expired.
Despite this, the non-profit organization Crime Stoppers of Houston, which had previously offered a $5,000 reward and later received another $20,000 donation from Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, it was reported that the police questioned pastor Joel Austin about the money found in the wall of the Lakewood Church.
Tanya, her statements, her actions - this is her characteristic “as a real person”.
That is why the attitude towards her is so negative.
And it’s not that she’s “financially significantly richer than all the writers”, as they write here.
There are people who are richer, but not all of them behave so brazenly, so provocatively as this lady.
A Promtex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190x190.
Spring orthopedic mattress Soft Cocos 1.
It is based on a TFK block (256 springs per square metre).
The independent springs allow for proper load distribution.
Coconut coir (a material made from the fibers of the coconut palm) is used as a filler.
Layers of felt are placed between the filling and the spring block.
Both sides of the mattress are above average in firmness.
Jacquard Sense removable cover: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The density of the fabric is 116 g/m².
Again, it's simple and delicious.
I was looking for chicken recipes on your page.
They gave us a chicken.
Our friends were growing it on their farm.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
I want to make it tastier.
I want to find a recipe for chicken baked in pieces in beer.
Have you tried that?
I trust you more than just recipes from the Internet.
A new case of human infection with avian influenza virus has been recorded in China
A new case of human infection with the H5N6 highly pathogenic avian influenza virus has been recorded in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station, citing a notification from the Hong Kong health authorities, TASS reports.
A 68-year-old resident of the Huizhou urban district in southern Guangdong province was infected, who kept poultry at home.
His condition is assessed by medics as critical.
The first-ever human infection with the H5N6 virus strain was recorded in May 2014 in the southwestern province of Sichuan.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has risen to 53.
Brazil requires citizens to present vaccination passports when entering the country
In Brazil, it has been made mandatory for those entering the country to present a COVID-19 passport. This decision was made by the Federal Supreme Court of Brazil (STF) judge Luis Roberto Barroso.
CNN Brazil reports this.
Citizens with contraindications to vaccination are exempt from presenting a vaccination certificate.
Also, people arriving from countries where the vaccine has been proven to be absent are included in the list of exceptions.
"The situation is even more serious when you consider that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year's, pre-Carnival and Carnival parties, as well as other events, which implies an increase in tourist traffic," said Barros.
Earlier, the Brazilian authorities required tourists who were not vaccinated against COVID-19 to observe a five-day quarantine.
A scheme for full protection from COVID-19 has been revealed
Virologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Honored Science Worker of Russia, Anatoly Altshtein, in an interview with Ura.ru, revealed the scheme for full protection from the coronavirus infection.
According to him, this can be achieved by means of an injection and the use of a nasal vaccine.
When administered intranasally, large amounts of IgA are produced. When the vaccine is administered by injection, this does not happen.
IgA immunoglobulins protect the mucous membranes, so the virus cannot get into the body.
And inside us, after vaccination, we produce the most immunoglobulins G (antibodies).
And if you get both vaccines, you will get a lot of IgA and IgG immunoglobulins. But there is no decision yet on double vaccination," the medic explained.
The chief prophylactician of the Urals Federal District, Doctor of Medical Sciences Sergei Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of using nasal vaccination in conjunction with an injection is the ability to stop being a carrier of COVID-19.
He added that this would help because in such a case, the body's defences are supposedly maximised.
Earlier, the Minister of Health of the Nizhny Novgorod Region, David Melik-Guseynov, stated that the spread of the new coronavirus infection among children would lead to a new outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic.
According to him, this is exactly what is observed in other countries, where the next wave of the pandemic came earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I talked to the dog (he died a long time ago) like this: if you are ready to exchange a warm home, food, affection, love, and games for a bitch in heat, then go ahead.
But Pesel was trained and he was smart.
I chose my company and went home.
In the video, the method that works in 90% of cases.
Don’t take my word for it.
I held back many owners so that they wouldn't run after the dog, although they said, "Look, 200,000 are running away (Pomskies), I just took their hand and led them in the other direction.
In the end, the "200 thousand" chose the owner, and not the dog, which was running somewhere there.
Mass protests against vaccination continue in Europe
In the Austrian capital, Vienna, more than forty thousand protesters took to the streets.
They have expressed dissatisfaction with the restrictive measures and the government's plans to make vaccination against COVID-19 mandatory.
From February next year, unvaccinated people will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
Spaniards, outraged by the government's health policy, held a peaceful march in Madrid.
Some held up signs reading "This is a fake pandemic," "I will not be vaccinated."
A large-scale protest against sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, the COVID-19 certificate is mandatory for access to bars, restaurants, gyms, nursing homes and nightclubs.
The decision to introduce health passports was taken by the authorities of various regions of the country against the backdrop of an increase in the number of cases of coronavirus infection.
In Luxembourg, more than a thousand protesters have demonstrated against the tightening of restrictions and QR codes.
The action started peacefully but later escalated into clashes with the police.
A group of protesters began throwing stones at the police.
In response, law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolay S., even in Wikipedia there is no consensus on this matter.
Kashchevarova-Rudneva is also referred to as "the first Russian physician, doctor of medicine", probably because she began her studies earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve the title.
The only thing I agree with Zakharova on is that the Americans only brought death and looting to any country they appeared in.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetrical mattress made from natural coconut coir on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is firm, with layers of natural coconut on both sides.
The mattress is based on a block of independent TFK springs.
The independent springs help to distribute the load properly and help the body take its natural shape.
Natural coconut is hypoallergenic, hygienic, with excellent ventilation.
The natural jacquard case is thick, wear-resistant, and pleasant to the touch.
It's bad and sad to age alone, but it's inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad when you read about it.
A person should live as long as they can take care of themselves and not be a burden to anyone.
Best of health to all of you.
WHO has found “omicron” in already in dozens of countries
The World Health Organization (WHO) has announced that the new coronavirus strain "omicron" has already been detected in 63 countries.
A number of experts have already said that the spread of the new strain could have catastrophic consequences.
The WHO reported on the rate of spread of the strain.
According to the organization, as of December 9, the strain has already been identified in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it began to spread actively only at the end of November.
The WHO is also concerned about the rapid spread of the new variant of the coronavirus.
WHO experts express concern that the new strain, according to preliminary data, may be more widespread than the "Delta" strain, also known as the Indian variant of the coronavirus, which is currently leading in all countries without exception.
Before this, the Director-General of the World Health Organization, Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, stated that the Omicron strain is capable of having a significant impact on the course of the coronavirus pandemic.
The UK came to a similar conclusion.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that “omicron” will replace “delta” in the coming months.
And the number of those infected in Britain alone will be around 1 million. This is despite the fact that officially, "omicron" is currently affecting several hundred people in the Kingdom, and according to estimates, up to 10,000 people.
British experts predict tens of thousands of deaths from the "omicron" strain, and at the peak more than 2 thousand people will be taken to hospitals daily.
Something the British healthcare system will not be able to cope with.
The situation is complicated by the fact that according to the latest studies, the effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower in comparison with other types of the disease.
It is not yet known how the Russian Sputnik V vaccine will react to “omicron” - this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has just begun testing the Russian vaccine on the "omicron" strain.
Why do we need to see the stages of ageing?
It would be better to SEE in more detail the performance of your exercises.
It is unclear in the first exercise how to do it: sitting on the heels or standing on the knees, as written, but how then to press your hands on your hips?
Or hands on the hips?
Curious Squirrel, you are right, communication on the Internet is completely different, they communicate easily and spontaneously, but when they meet in person, they have nothing to say.
And to see a person in real life, it may not be what you expected, it didn't grab you - and that's where the attitude comes from.
When he meets his person, then his views will change.
And once again, the Soviet period is being called “the time of devils”.
Then people believed in God far more honestly than they do today.
And they were raised practically according to the laws of God (love your neighbor, don’t steal, etc.).
What is the ideology today? Money at any cost.
People like Globa have little faith (and none at all, in fact), but even if so, the time of the devil came in the 1990s...
Our St. Petersburg, more precisely, Leningrad, communal apartment on Bolshaya Zelenina is still in contact.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we try to maintain a warm relationship with the older generation.
Perhaps this is due to the fact that there were no visitors in the apartment, the rooms were not rented out, and the blockade brotherhood was never cancelled.
Unfortunately, we see each other more and more at funerals.
Lara Angelskaya, come on, give it up!
Human infants, especially males, are strong, active, energetic, rambunctious, pushy, fighting, and scrapping, just like their little "cousins" in the wild!
It's a shame that they are not as soft as puppies or kittens, so bruises, bumps, and scratches are common, and no boomerang!
And why should they?
Did the brother push him without calculating his strength?
And you have always been so dexterous that you have never accidentally hurt anyone or injured yourself?
SkySleep Wave Space BS 150x185 cm mattress.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BS) spring mattress has a medium firmness on both sides.
The comfort layers of the mattress - a combination of coconut fibre and artificial latex with a textured surface - ErgoFoam.
The cover is made of cotton, with a jacquard weave.
It is strong, wear-resistant, and at the same time, it allows air to pass through well, without interfering with the ventilation of the mattress.
The cover is quilted with synthetic wadding, which makes it soft.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
The coir of a coconut has antimicrobial properties, it is hard, and evenly distributes the weight placed on it.
The artificial latex with a grid-cut surface provides the mattress with a micro-massage effect.
Long-lasting materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnell block, in which the springs are connected to each other, is characterized by reliability, it can withstand large loads, it is well suited for couples with a small weight difference.
The perimeter of the product is reinforced with a PU foam box - it extends the life of the mattress and protects the springs from edge deformation.
Israel PM Bennett announced the start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Health Ministry began an emergency program to boost vaccinations on Sunday.
From the morning of December 12, vaccination against the coronavirus is being carried out in schools throughout Israel.
Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett announced at today's cabinet meeting that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose of citizens in the risk group will also be studied.
In Israel, mass vaccination of the population against the COVID-19 coronavirus infection began on December 20, 2020.
Israelis are being vaccinated with the Pfizer drug.
Since January 10 of last year, vaccinated people have begun to receive the second dose.
Vaccination of 12-15 year olds in the country began in early June this year.
So far, more than 5.78 million people have received both doses of the vaccine, while more than 4.12 million citizens have received the third dose.
Anna Gauer, well, probably a tick won't crawl into the trap; it's an ARACHNID, as LYLIA put it.
In any case, I don't see a tick.
But I'm curious, what if there is?
You have to give him something else to tempt him
Dimax Genius 70x190 children's mattress
Children's two-sided mattress made of natural latex and natural coconut coir with an EVS500 independent spring unit.
A children's spring free latex and coir mattress on an independent spring unit.
Natural latex is a soft, elastic material that is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic, and has excellent properties, making sleep as comfortable as possible.
The other side of the mattress is medium-firm, comfortable, made of natural coconut fibre and latex.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs.
The springs distribute the load as accurately and evenly as possible across the surface of the mattress, supporting the body in its natural position.
It's a great option for schoolchildren and teenagers.
The case is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant, and not subject to abrasion.
Seven people have died in Brazil as a result of downpours
At least seven people died and 175 were injured as a result of heavy rains that hit the north-eastern Brazilian state of Bahia and neighboring Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS, citing emergency services.
An extratropical cyclone has been raging in the border region of these states since the middle of the week, as a result of which the amount of precipitation in the region has reached 450 mm. A state of emergency has been declared in 25 municipalities of the Bahia state, and in some of them, the floods have been the most destructive in 35 years.
Several bridges, two dams and three roads have been destroyed by the elements.
According to the rescuers, about 5,700 people were left homeless, and another 6,700 were forced to leave their homes.
The damage from the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents of the region.
Nika Lerman, I know Levomekol ointment, I work with medicines.
It's very anti-inflammatory.
Personally, I prefer Bepanten for the regeneration of superficial wounds and bruises, but you know better what is more effective.
The main thing is that the healing process is going, such a hole was, it was just horrible.
Hello, Spain, you didn't hear or understand me.
I will answer with the lines of M. Isakovsky: "Migratory birds fly by\nIn search of the past summer.
They fly to warm countries,\nBut I don't want to fly away,\nBut I stay with you,\nMy dear side!\n
I don't need another man's sun,\nI don't need another man's land".
And believe me, photos from the ski park, or my city, will be just as good.
By the way, it would be much more interesting to see your wonderful home with its interiors.
MAPED (France) Color'peps Twist wax crayons (12 colors), twist-up, in a plastic case.
A set of 12 bright wax crayons in a plastic barrel with a twist-up stick.
They don't crumble, don't stain hands, and are absolutely safe.
They do not require sharpening.
The case is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-use packaging: zip-lock bag.
$135 billion went into apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, user spending in apps grew worldwide by 25%, and the number of downloads - by 8%.
The most popular services in the world turned out to be various video services.
The most-downloaded app was video editor CapCut, and the most money spent was on YouTube.
Both the number of applications downloaded and user spending in them showed significant growth in the period from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads increased by 8% to reach 140 billion. User spending in apps grew even more: by 25%, to a record $135 billion.
The analytical company App Annie published such data and presented a report on the mobile application market in 2021.
In 2021, the world economy came out of the lockdown and began the post-pandemic recovery.
"Will such a "return to the physical" slow down the growth of the app economy? Not at all", the authors of the report believe.
India was the leader in terms of the number of app downloads: it accounted for about 20% of all downloads.
The United States (9%) and Brazil (8%) follow it.
iOS gadget users spent more than Android users did, as they have in the past: 65% of all app spending was on iOS.
Among the applications, the video editor CapCut took first place for the number of downloads in 2021.
It is followed by two Indian apps - video service MX TakaTak and online shopping app Meesho.
Telegram is also in the top 10 for the number of downloads.
In general, according to the number of downloads, VPN services (there are two of them in the top 10 - VPN Master and NightOwl VPN) and services related to creating and broadcasting videos (in addition to CapCut and MX TakaTak, two more such services are in the top 10 - Moj and SnackVideo) are popular among users.
"Users spent the most time in live streaming and online streaming apps," the authors of the report note.
YouTube is in the lead here, in the top 5 in terms of user spending are also the video service TikTok, streaming video services Disney+ and HBO Max, as well as the Japanese manga subscription service Piccoma.
The first places in terms of the number of monthly active users are taken by Telegram, Instagram, Zoom and TikTok, and the mobile version of Microsoft Office is in fifth place.
In Russia, the shopping app AliExpress became the leader in terms of the number of downloads in a year.
It is followed by Zenly, which shows the location of friends, and the same CapCut.
Also in the top 10 apps are: online karaoke app StarMaker, online fashion retailer Shein, Maps for Minecraft PE app, online taxi ordering service DiDi, Pure Tuber YouTube client, Dixy retailer app and Samokat online store.
People around the world have adapted to the pandemic by going mobile, which can be called one of the main conclusions.
The most successful sectors have been those that have helped people to be closer, both virtually and in person," said Lexi Sydow, head of market intelligence at App Annie, commenting on the results of the report.
The revenue of the mobile games sector reached $90 billion in 2021. The leaders in terms of the number of downloads were casual and hyper-casual games, in which there is no or almost no plot, and the video design is minimal.
Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race made it into the top 3 most popular games in the world.
In Russia, the most popular games are DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls, and Phone Case DIY.
Earlier, App Annie presented its forecast for 2022.
Among the main trends of the next year, the company's analysts named the growth in the number of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the growth in popularity among Generation Z of financial applications, for example, the Robinhood investment application, as well as the further increase in the popularity of metaverse mobile games.
De File treat for dogs with beef, 30 units of 40 g.
A natural, dried treat for dogs of all breeds and ages made from beef.
Clan De File is a meat fillet for dogs with beef, and nothing more.
A natural dried treat for dogs of all breeds and ages.
Only one kind of protein is used in its preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of food allergies, making the treat ideal for dogs with sensitive tummies or prone to allergic reactions.
The core of the treat is a meat fillet that has been processed according to quality standards that are used when preparing food for humans - human grade.
Recommended Daily Allowance: No more than 10% of an adult animal's daily diet.
Calories: 407.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Nutritional value: protein - 57, fat - 17, ash - 4, moisture - 20.
Russians warned about a new fraud scheme
Scammers have started looking for new tricks to commit fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this, citing experts.
According to Ivideon’s Director of Products, Zaur Abutalimov, the main danger associated with the spread of video communication devices is deepfakes.
In this case, the scammers create a fake video based on real records with the participation of the victim.
Thanks to this, the neural network is able to accurately reproduce the features of the behavior of a particular person.
Abutailimov added that using deepfakes, criminals can call the victim's acquaintances via video call or create a video with a copy of a person to send for the purpose of extortion.
"These fakes can easily provoke bullying as a savvy perpetrator can place people in ridiculous, dangerous or compromising fake scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis senior systems engineer Alexander Vetkol noted that psychologically, people tend to trust others more when they can see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the case of technologies using video.
David, I'll add.
In what I wrote above, I focused on the fact that I bought all of this in a small town, where the local mentality did not allow me to wear a lot of makeup and wear short skirts, show my stockings and tights on my legs.
It is a province, but there was such a product in the store.
In big cities, Muslim women dyed their hair and showed their legs.
And so it is in Dushanbe, which is a large city and the capital of the republic.
There are many fashionistas, but the same cosmetics are not available.
Five things to do to help avoid diabetes
Blood sugar problems are some of the most common in the world.
However, some people don't take this seriously enough, and that's a mistake.
Diabetes can lead to serious complications and even death over time.
Prophylactic measures play the main role in preventing the formation of diseases.
Thus, doctors recommend changing the drinking regime: reducing the number of various drinks and switching to ordinary water has a positive effect on metabolism.
Sugary foods raise blood sugar to dangerous levels when eaten in excess.
Therefore, the first step towards a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and keeping them at home.
The appearance of the disease is not only affected by improper nutrition, but also by habits.
To reduce the risks of diabetes, it is necessary to move a lot.
Experts recommend sticking to a low-carb diet.
Such a diet will not only help you lose weight, but will also protect you from sharp fluctuations in sugar levels.
In order to protect yourself from diabetes, you need to eat a lot of fiber.
Dietary fibre fills the stomach and so promotes the feeling of satiety, the release of digestive juices and the better absorption of food.
Tomatoes Gavrish Pink Bush F1 0.10 g, article number 4241014.
A dwarf, early beefsteak tomato with heavy cropping for growing outdoors and under temporary plastic cover.
The plant is determinate, with short internodes.
The fruits are large, of a deep pink colour, quite firm, weighing 180-210 g, protected from sunburn by leaves, and store well.
The pulp is juicy, with a sugary taste.
The hybrid has resistance to a complex of diseases.
Recommended for salads, appetizers, and slicing.
Sowing for seedlings: in late March - early April.
Harvesting - at the stage of the first true leaf.
Seedlings will be planted in greenhouses in May.
After planting in the open ground, the plants are shaped and tied.
MK SLAVDA FC-160.
This freezer has an A energy efficiency rating, meaning it uses significantly less electricity when in use.
The freezer is well suited for both a private home and an apartment thanks to the use of high-quality, low-noise compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera works no louder than a regular refrigerator.
The quick freezing function freezes products as quickly as possible, preserving the maximum amount of nutrients.
The Slavda FC-160 freezer cabinet corresponds to the N/ST climate class, which allows it to work without problems at a room temperature of up to +38 degrees.
Digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Dr Pavlova spoke about “weekend migraines” in workaholics
There are several factors that can lead to a deterioration in health over the weekend
The reason for a deterioration in well-being after working days is often a ‘weekend migraine’, the well-known endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior scientific staff member of the Faculty of Fundamental Medicine at Moscow State University, and scientific director of the Systemic Medicine Clinic, Zukhra Pavlova, told in her Telegram channel.
According to her, workaholics are most often affected by this, who suffer from headaches, fatigue and weakness on the weekends.
Doctor Pavlov noted that, in addition to the fatigue accumulated over the course of the week, there are plenty of objective reasons for the body’s negative reaction to a change in conditions.
On weekends, our lives are turned upside down.
"We sleep a lot, lie on the couch all day, probably eat more and drink less," the doctor argued. "Because of the lack of coffee, there is a slight withdrawal.
Due to overeating and lack of water - heaviness and fatigue".
The late rise plays an additional role.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you will experience a reaction that is called jet lag.
It occurs in travelers who cross multiple time zones.
In order to determine which of the factors is playing a decisive role in the deterioration of her well-being, Pavlova recommended paying attention to what changes the most on the weekends.
Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 mattress, 130x185.
The reinforced perimeter of high-density foam significantly extends the life of the mattress.
The "Optimal Hard S1000" mattress with different levels of hardness on either side, overall height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum permissible load on one bed is up to 140 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is in a separate fabric pocket, allowing the body's weight to be properly distributed.
To provide additional protection for the spring block, an insulating layer of felt has been added to separate the mattress filling from the springs.
On one side of the mattress is a 2-centimetre layer of coconut coir, which provides additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
Cotton Jacquard, quilted with 2 cm of synthetic latex and 1 cm of Hollcon material for additional comfort.
On the other side of the mattress is a 1cm thick layer of coconut coir and a layer of felt has been used.
The fabric has been treated with a special antibacterial Sanitized (Sweden) impregnation.
The impregnation ensures complete destruction of mould, does not allow the development of micro-organisms, dust mites and microbes.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning, as well as ventilators for additional ventilation of the layers.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine ineffective against 'omicron'
South Africa says Pfizer vaccine ineffective against ‘Omicron’
South African researchers have conducted a study and reported on the low effectiveness of the Pfizer vaccine against the Omicron strain of the coronavirus infection.
It (the level of "Omicron" neutralization) is estimated to be (the level of) vaccine effectiveness at 22.5% against symptomatic infection, which... casts doubt on the ability of the vaccine to protect against infection, according to the text of the study published on the MedRxiv portal.
At the same time, experts clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Earlier, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the omicron variant of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in the UK with more frequent hospitalizations than a year ago.
How much hidden sugar is in everyday products?
Sugar is not the best source of beneficial nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes as well as cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that an unfamiliar-sounding ingredient in a product may be a hidden sugar - an ingredient similar to sugar in terms of calories, composition, and glycemic index.
The label may list dozens of names, all essentially meaning sugar.
Some of the most common and frequently encountered names are glucose and fructose.
There may also be other extracted sugars such as dextrose (sugar from corn), levulose (fructose), molasses (black treacle), agave syrup, etc.
These are all the simple sugars that fall under monosaccharides and disaccharides, and they can be not only in confectionery, but also in ketchup, in the doctor's sausage, in bread and so on.
According to Rospotrebnazor, the most effective way to reduce sugar intake is to eat whole and unprocessed products, and to pay attention to the label and to the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar vary in flavor, but no matter what the ingredient is called in a product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it's still sugar.
Calculating the exact amount of sugar is not easy, as you need to take into account not only the amount of sugar indicated by the manufacturer on the package, but also the fact that vegetables, fruits, etc. originally contain a certain amount of sugar.
As a result, the total amount of sugar can end up being significantly higher than what's listed on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose importance for the Federal Republic of Germany in 25 years
Germany's new Chancellor Olaf Scholz said that gas imports were losing importance for Germany as the country continued its transition to a decarbonized economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045 and become a climate-neutral country.
"In other words, 25 years from now, the world will be such that the issue of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role," the chancellor said.
Scholz noted that Germany continues to be committed to Ukraine transporting Russian natural gas in the future, as this resource is currently important for the energy transition.
He reminded that Germany and the United States made a statement in which the support of Berlin for the energy transformation of Ukraine was recorded.
Earlier, German Foreign Minister Annalena Baerbock said that the certification process for the Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline continues.
According to the minister, within the framework of the coalition negotiations and the discussion of the coalition agreement, it was stated that energy projects should be subject to European energy law.
The diplomat also pointed out that the pipeline "does not meet the requirements" of the European Union.
Thanks for the interesting photos!
In 1985 I had to travel to those parts.
I remember very well the ChMEZ rising from the Kanatchikovo station up the hill, past an old building (resembling a signalling post, two-storey), along Kanatchikovo Street, and turning right onto Vavilov Street to the factory gates...
Hackers break into Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister
Hackers have broken into Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi's Twitter account.
The perpetrators managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India had allegedly recognized Bitcoin as a legitimate payment method, as well as that the country had already purchased the cryptocurrency.
Modi's office asked to ignore the new messages.
Representatives of the prime minister stated that Twitter reacted quickly - access to the account was restored.
The page of the Prime Minister of India was already hacked in 2020 and called for donations to a fund using cryptocurrency.
Referendum in New Caledonia sees majority vote against independence
In New Caledonia, the third referendum held on 12 December ended with the same result as the two previous ones.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12, at noon, the majority of New Caledonians voted during the referendum against the independence of their territory.
At the same time, the level of participation in this third vote was significantly lower than in the two previous ones.
According to preliminary results published by local authorities, 3.51% (2,755 people) voted in favor of New Caledonia's independence from France, while 96.49% (75,762) voted against.
Turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 residents of New Caledonia taking part in the election.
As France-Presse commented on these interim results, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt," as the independence supporters called on voters not to participate in the vote.
As the initiators of the referendum, they opposed its holding on 12 December, considering that a new outbreak of the COVID-19 epidemic on the archipelago makes it impossible to hold a full-fledged and "honest" election campaign.
Thus, this absence paved the way for a third victory for the supporters of French New Caledonia, after the referendums conducted in November 2018 and in October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of residents voted against independence, in 2020 - 53.3%.
The separatists say they do not recognize the results of the latest vote and will challenge them at the United Nations.
As reported on Sunday, 12 December, by the Elysée Palace, French President Emmanuel Macron is due to make a statement on the results of this referendum.
The issue of New Caledonia's independence has dominated the final weeks of the French presidential campaign.
Several presidential candidates have argued that the territory should remain part of France because it is "the last European Union presence in the Pacific."
"New Caledonia must remain French at all costs," Eric Zemmour repeated over and over again.
The same statement was made by the Republican candidate Valerie Pecresse, who published an article in Le Figaro at the end of October, calling on the Caledonians to remain French.
For his part, Emmanuel Macron announced in May 2018 that he would not take a position "because it is not his responsibility".
However, the president added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, for his part, expressed "a strong desire that the choice of the Caledonians be a choice for France".
Sveta, hi!
I was a little... I was a little rude to you, I'm still embarrassed, I'm sorry.
Thank you for not turning your back on my channel.
On the subject: I am not an artist, I like to draw, but it turns out to be an inspired scrawl.
But as an artist - not an artist at all: what would you change here?
Just don't forget that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as widespread as it is now.
But medicine was at zero - leeches, garlic and infusions.
These days, they would have been put back on their feet in no time.
And the food has absolutely nothing to do with it.
Turkey tested the world's first drone with a laser weapon
Turkey conducted successful tests of the world's first drone with laser weapons.
The Eren drone was tested at a distance of 100 to 500 m, reports MIR24.
The device is capable of neutralising explosive items from a distance using a laser.
The maximum flight altitude of the new model is 3,000 m.
After passing the relevant tests, the drone will be put into service for the Turkish military, which will use it to destroy explosive devices without the involvement of sappers.
The agency emphasizes that Turkey is among the six countries in the world capable of developing and manufacturing its own drones.
I cut the hunchback into steaks.
Salt, sugar, black pepper and allspice.
I sometimes add carnation, it does not hurt.
I put it in a deep bowl, and covered it with a plate.
Well, that's pretty much it.
And why do I need this salmon, for such money, it is unknown what kind of salmon, excellent salmon is a great fish.
Bread, butter and herring.
It's an amazing sandwich.
WSJ readers criticize article on Russia-U.S. relations
Readers of The Wall Street Journal criticized an article by Professor Christopher Hartwell, in which he described his vision of relations between Russia and the United States.
The author of the material expressed concern that the West is allegedly sacrificing Ukraine to Russia.
In his article, he convinces readers of the danger emanating from Moscow and makes a number of insulting remarks against Russian President Vladimir Putin.
At the end, Hartwell called on Western countries to "stand united against Russia."
Readers of the WSJ expressed their disagreement with the position of the American professor.
"There is a lot of false information in this article," RIA Novosti quotes one of the readers as saying.
“Europe is not ours to “lose”, and Ukraine is not our land.
The U.S. and NATO allies will never start a nuclear war with Russia over Ukraine," another said.
Patches can also be applied to the area around the lips.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch used in the production of the Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch is a high-tech polymer that provides increased absorption and delivery of high-concentration natural plant essence to the skin, tightly adheres to the skin and gives a feeling of freshness.
When delivering nutrients to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the accompanying loss of moisture and causes the essence to penetrate deep layers of the skin.
SONEX 2085/EL ceiling light with Nores PIR
The NORES 2085/EL lamp consists of a metal base and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser material is a high-quality white matte acrylic, which provides even diffusion and good light transmission for the luminaire.
The shape of the lampshade is square, in the shape of a relief ornament with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent points, giving the lit lamp a beautiful effect of "starry twinkle" and iridescence.
The IP43 rating allows the light to be used in certain areas of wet rooms.
Included is a replaceable LED module with lenses, 72 W, which corresponds to a 520 W incandescent lamp.
Also included is a remote control, which allows for smooth adjustment of the colour temperature from 3000 to 6000K, adjustment of brightness, and transition to the mode for switching between warm/white/cold/night lighting.
Uriage Face Mask Hydrating Thermal Night 50 ml.
An ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types with the effect of fresh, rested and glowing skin in the morning!
The real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
It tones, smooths the skin's relief and restores the skin barrier.
It has a very pleasant water-gel texture without stickiness.
An excellent skin care product after exposure to the sun!
Hypoallergenic.
An earthquake with a magnitude of 5.2 occurred in the Kuril Islands region
A 5.2 magnitude earthquake occurred near the Kuril island of Shikotan.
It is noted that the epicenter of the earthquake was 231.8 km north-east of the city of Severo-Kurilsk.
The epicenter was at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded a 7.5-magnitude earthquake in Peru, during which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make his way in the world, his petty-bourgeois mindset would have been lost.
It's good when you come to America as a famous person.
But if you were born there, you wouldn't know what to fight for.
So it was a waste of time for him to throw mud, bile and poison at the construction, which is fairer than anyone has yet come up with.
Ukraine will start producing new-generation loitering munitions
The new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will begin to produce unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) of the ANKA type.
On December 11, this was reported by the non-staff advisor to the head of the Ukrainian president’s office, Aleksey Arestovich.
That is, they are capable of acting against air targets, against other drones.
Even against piloted aircraft.
They will have Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the body and so on", Dialog.ua quotes him as saying.
Discussing the main features of the ANKA drones, Arestovich said that they are jet-powered, not piston-powered UAVs.
According to him, this is a new generation of drones after the Bayraktar, which exceed it "in all characteristics".
The first batch of UAVs should be produced by the factory at the end of next year, concluded Arestovich.
The ANKA unmanned aerial vehicle was created by the Turkish Space Agency in February 2014.
The drone was developed by the Turkish government in cooperation with a number of private companies since 2010.
The day before, the Ukrainian General Staff classified data on the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems during the military operations of the united forces in Donbass.
On 6 December, Ukrainian President Volodymyr Zelensky reported that the construction of a factory for the production of modern military drones had begun in the country.
According to him, Ukraine intends to use drones.
On September 29, Bayraktar Savunma and the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense signed an agreement on the construction of a center in the Kyiv region, where personnel will be trained, as well as tests and maintenance of the Turkish Bayraktar UAVs.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader's office called this memorandum "a big real step forward."
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions have escaped at Singapore's Changi Airport.
This was reported by The Straits Times.
Two predators managed to get out of the container with seven lions, which arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it remains unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore, and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions lay down on top of a shipping container.
The animals could not get away from it because of the protective net installed nearby.
The standoff ended after the arrival at the airport of officials from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which oversees all of Singapore's zoos.
They immobilized the lions with tranquilizer darts and plan to transport them to a quarantine facility.
Earlier it was reported that in Phnom Penh, the capital of Cambodia, a lion escaped from its owner and wandered the streets of the city.
The same day, the animal voluntarily returned home, people were not hurt.
Experts warn of cancer threat from vitamin B9
Research suggests that an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, may cause cancer.
This was warned by the Daily Express publication.
According to the experts, there is strong evidence that people who do not have a deficiency of folic acid are less likely to develop certain types of cancer, in particular, colorectal cancer.
However, exceeding the necessary dose, on the contrary, promotes the growth of cancer cells.
University of Alabama at Birmingham professor and dietitian Beth Kitchin suggests monitoring the amount of folic acid consumed throughout the day.
The optimal dosage is 400 micrograms per day.
The risk of cancer only increases if you are significantly above or below this figure.
Kitchin advises not to take B9 in pill form without a doctor's recommendation, to be careful with the dosage and to avoid cereals with milk and other foods that contain folic acid.
Earlier, nutritionist Rachel Fine called folic acid a substance that slows aging.
As it is found, among other things, in avocados, Fein recommended that men over the age of 50 eat more of the fruit.
In the UK, around 75,000 people could die from the omicron variant by April
British scientists predict that up to 75,000 people could die in England over the next five months as a result of the spread of the omicron strain of the coronavirus if restrictions are not tightened during the winter.
The Guardian newspaper reported this, citing a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM), TASS reports.
According to the most optimistic forecast of the experts who are part of the Scientific Advisory Group for Emergencies at the British Cabinet, by April 2022, the country will record at least 25,000 deaths from the omicron strain, and a total of about 175,000 patients will be hospitalized.
Meanwhile, at the peak of the disease, hospitals will accept more than 2,000 infected people daily.
"Serious coronavirus control measures may be needed to avoid overwhelming the NHS if the Omicron variant is more transmissible than the Delta variant and existing vaccines do not prevent infections," said mathematician Rosanna Barnard from LSHTM.
Previously, the UK Health Security Agency reported: if the spread rate of the omicron strain remains at the current level, then by the end of the year about 1 million cases of infection will be detected in the country.
At the same time, by the middle of December, the omicron strain could become dominant in the United Kingdom.
There are currently 1,898 confirmed cases of the omicron variant in the UK, of which 633 were identified in the past 24 hours.
At the same time, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health, Sajid Javid, pointed out that in reality, this figure may already have reached 10,000 cases.
I wanted to make some kind of smart comment, but I read up to this point:
"A fur coat, obtained as a result of the unimaginable suffering of an unfortunate animal and its employment for a second job."
And it fell under the table!
So, it turns out that "unfortunate animal" is a husband, and I thought it was a chinchilla!
The last knight on this planet.
Richard Gray, judging by the dislikes, you express your thoughts in a way that is not very accessible to most people.
What did you mean - that those who are on Instagram are pretending, or that they are all really doing everything, because there is no need for them to pretend?
The SZ is like a clearance sale, everything that didn’t sell at the time ends up here.
If you set yourself a goal and dig around a bit, you can find something worthwhile among the rubbish.
You just need to be patient and have a clear understanding of what you are looking for.
Demand for superyachts has grown by a quarter around the world
Superyacht construction this year and orders for next year are breaking all records worldwide, despite calls to reduce carbon footprints and combat climate change.
According to the World Register of Ships, the number of ordered yachts is 1,200 units, which is a quarter more than last year.
In an era of tackling the consequences of climate change, it is hard to imagine that the number of people with both the desire and the money for a £50m-plus floating fortress will not fall, says The Guardian.
However, there are more and more of them.
This year 25% more ships have been ordered than last year.
Brokers say they have not seen such a frenzy in the market in 20 years.
The first reason is that many who can afford a yacht fear infection on land and prefer to hide from the pandemic on board their own vessel.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
Previously, all these people went to the office and met with business partners in person, but now the absolute majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are conducted via Zoom.
Broker Will Christie told the paper that shipyards are taking orders for new yachts for 2025 and beyond.
This means that clients are willing to pay more to have their yacht ready at least a year or two earlier.
"People just wanted freedom and the super-rich could afford it," he says.
In Western society, many criticize such behavior by the wealthy and call it decadent.
The rich, say sociologists, don't want to understand that in times of austerity, space travel, life on yachts or flights on their own private planes cause irritation in society, because the elite doesn't want to share responsibility for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are calling on governments to act by imposing new taxes and rules on the super-rich, although they acknowledge it will be extremely difficult to do so with money so mobile.
Meanwhile, it is only the number of ordered superyachts that is impressive, but also their characteristics.
Of the 1200 ships, 27 have a stern length of more than 100 meters.
The Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the REV Ocean yacht, which is 183 meters long.
After its launch, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht features a "moon pool," as well as a submarine for exploring the depths of the sea.
Helicopter pads, open-air cinemas and, on some, such as the fighter McGregor's yacht, a combat platform have become commonplace on superyachts. Professor of economic anthropology at Indiana University, Richard Wilk, says that compared to the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions, the carbon footprint of the super-rich is negligible.
But it has symbolic significance, given that there are just over 2,000 multi-billionaires in the world.
It's just another example of extreme consumption by a very small group of people.
Scientists have found that the carbon footprint of billionaires is thousands of times greater than that of the average person on the planet.
If one person produces an average of 5 tons of CO2 per year, the planet's biggest polluter, Roman Abramovich, is responsible for 33.9 tons of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere in 2018.
At the same time, two-thirds of the emission trail came from his 162.5-meter yacht Eclipse.
Even if the owner isn't on board the yacht, the crew continues to pollute the planet.
The owner can call the captain and order him to bring the yacht, for example, from the Mediterranean to the Caribbean.
Superyacht owners do not inspire sympathy when they, like Australia's richest woman Gina Rinehart, who owns mines on the continent, complain on YouTube that there is no berth for their giant vessels.
It is also hard to understand her call to build marinas for ships with a length of 50 metres.
Dangerous weekly alcohol limit linked to bowel cancer
American researchers have determined the amount of alcoholic beverages per week that increases the risk of developing cancer.
This is reported by the Daily Express publication.
Experts have concluded that drinking four or more alcoholic drinks a week is associated with an increased risk of developing cancer.
At the same time, the risk of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
What's more, men who drink moderately have a higher risk of developing bowel cancer than women.
Scientists are unable to determine the exact cause of the development of this type of cancer, noting only that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the body.
Thanks to the author for the worthy material and photos.
Sergei, I see nothing wrong with egoism and pride.
Just like you don't see egotism and pride in the little man who is looking for a free surrogate mother in order to dump the costs and responsibilities on her and enjoy the title of father from a safe distance.
Why are they working in the ministry? They should be working in a circus.
I understand that everything should have been on a royal scale, but the model is very over-the-top.
It's hard to imagine how poor Diana was crammed into the carriage, and in general, any movement.
I was 12 and I remember watching the ceremony on TV.
It would seem that almost all girls dream of being princesses in beautiful, voluminous dresses, and I am no exception.
But looking at this dress, I changed my mind about being a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old child
Many, and indeed all, dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they have no idea just how advanced their four-legged companions really are.
Over the years, biologists have conducted various experiments to find out for sure how intelligent animals are.
While a dog's vocabulary isn't as extensive as a human's, a new study shows that a dog can consistently respond to 89 words or phrases.
The scientists' work was published in Sciencealert.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they don't understand politics, economics or art, yet they often manage to fool their owners.
Some breeds, experts say, show the best results in understanding human language, but there is not enough statistical data for accurate conclusions.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered canine geniuses - for example, Labradors.
The scientists concluded that dogs are capable of logical thinking, and their ability to learn is not inferior to that of a two-year-old child.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
Mattress on TFK independent spring block with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made from the independent TFK block.
This is a reliable modern construction with 512 independent springs per sleeping place.
Each spring is in a separate pocket and has no influence on neighboring ones.
As a result, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
People take on their natural form while sleeping.
The springs are isolated from the top layers by a layer of thermal blanket for strength.
On top of the felt are layers of natural latex and coconut, which have excellent and beautiful properties.
One side is topped with a thin layer of natural seven-zone latex.
This natural filler has 7 zones of comfort, contributes to the perception of a person's weight, and has a slight massaging effect.
The Antistress cover is made from velour, with 250 grams of hollow fibre per square metre of padding.
It is pleasant to touch and look at, and it has a calming, relaxing effect.
Sova is a bright example - the deep-sea anglerfish Taumatikhth Aksel.
Some of his victims are so great that they cause the death of the angler.
It simply can't swallow them, and its teeth won't allow it to spit the prey back into the water.
If you don't care about the fate of your four properties, then why did you think that your properties were of interest to anyone and that they would care about them?
The law today does allow you to manage your property.
If you don't like how others are doing it, do it yourself.
Ukraine is ready for a deal with the US and Russia
The U.S. and Russia will “bargain” over Ukraine’s accession to NATO, analyst Alexander Kochetkov stated in his article for the Glavred publication.
According to him, Washington and Moscow plan to continue negotiations in the near future regarding the guarantees of the United States that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Alliance, despite the words of the American leader Joe Biden about the right of countries “to join anywhere”.
If you are offered something that is obviously unacceptable, such as the sale of a close relative into sexual slavery, you will not haggle, but simply send the offerer away.
And as for Ukraine, there will be negotiations," the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia has no plans to attack Ukraine, but is seeking dialogue with Kiev.
"Preparations are conducted secretly, quickly, and they go straight into offensive action, instead of waiting for the grouping to be detected and for countermeasures to be deployed," he said.
China is promoting the development of the railway industry
Advanced Chinese technologies have attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Exhibition, held in Zhuzhou City, Hunan Province/Central China/.
The main technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co. Ltd. allow trains to automatically detect and diagnose technical faults, noted company representative Hou Zhaowen.
The high-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, ensuring the reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
Over the past six months, China has significantly increased the export of rail vehicles, and many countries in Asia and Europe have witnessed the "Chinese speed".
In May of this year, the first two-storey high-speed electric train designed in China rolled off the production line of CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd., and was intended for export to Europe.
With a maximum working speed of 200 kilometres per hour, these trains will run on the railways of Austria, Germany, Hungary and other European countries.
In November, test operation of the metro train developed by the above-mentioned company for Turkey began.
The train will move along the metro line that connects the centre of Istanbul with the city’s airport.
The metro line will open next year.
This will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 kilometres per hour.
"China's railway equipment manufacturing industry is one of the industries with the highest level of innovation and the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Feng Yaoyan, head of the trade and investment department of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade (CCPIT).
"This industry is the main competitive advantage of Chinese high-end equipment in the global market", said Feng Yaoshan.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has built a leading railway equipment production system, with a complete set of supporting facilities and large-scale production activities.
According to Fan Yaoshan, the country ranks first in the level of electrification of railways and in the operational mileage of high-speed and urban railways.
A biologist listed the early signs of dementia
Candidate of biological sciences, Semyon Golosheikin, in conversation with Sputnik radio, listed the early signs of dementia.
According to him, the signs of future dementia can be forgetfulness, as well as a whole range of moderate cognitive disorders, such as the inability to concentrate, plan, and a decrease in abstract thinking.
It is currently under debate that hearing loss could be both an early sign of and a risk factor for Alzheimer's disease, the specialist said.
Golosheikin emphasized that the causes of dementia can include neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, certain infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and atherosclerosis of the blood vessels of the brain are the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that today doctors do not know of any effective methods of treating dementia.
That is why it is necessary to start its prevention on time.
According to him, studying foreign languages and engaging in active communication will help reduce the risk of developing dementia.
The WHO also recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regularly exercising cognitive skills with games and hobbies that require intensive engagement of memory and logical thinking
"There are recommendations for the use of various dietary supplements, however, their effectiveness and necessity are still being discussed in the scientific community," said Golosheikhin.
"The World Health Organization recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical exercise, regular training of cognitive skills and abilities with the help of games and hobbies that require intensive involvement of memory and logical thinking", said Golosheikhin.
Earlier, a UK charity for dementia research said that the disease was increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
Doctors named the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be vision problems, due to which the patient acquires difficulties in recognizing objects.
Another sign of developing dementia, experts say, is aphasia - a condition where a person cannot find the right words to convey what they want to say.
The neurologist has demanded that Saakashvili be sent abroad for treatment
The former President of Georgia, Mikheil Saakashvili, needs psychoneurological treatment and rehabilitation abroad, the neurologist Otar Toidze, who is part of the team of doctors created by the Ombudsman of Georgia, told journalists.
His [Saakashvili's] neurological status is leading in his illness.
The stable problems are problems with movement, coordination, and temperamental instability," the specialist said, noting that this does not go beyond the norm and now the former president needs to be sent for special rehabilitation.
"We call this neurorehabilitation and psychoneurorehabilitation, the possibility of which we did not find in Georgia," Toidze noted, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a special facility which does not exist in Georgia.
In the evening of 7 December, Saakashvili began sabotaging the receipt of medical assistance after the employees of the penitentiary service subjected him to disciplinary punishment.
The Georgian politician quickly managed to have the punishment reversed and restore his previous rights.
Alexandra, "Do you also take money for this?" - I'm interested to know where these people are coming from...
It is normal to pay for bread in the bakery, but not for the work of a tutor?
Or are we so holy that we eat prana?
There's another side to the medal, though.
These people are parasites on the body of society.
They don't work, they don't pay taxes, they live on benefits and off their relatives.
At the same time, they receive comprehensive medical care.
How many mouths can a job feed?
We feed all the drunks, and drug addicts, who also lost their health due to their stupidity.
Then we are surprised by the extension of the retirement age.
This money could be spent on treating people who are actually ill.
Undoubtedly, the red victory flag will forever remain in the history of our country, and it should not be confused with the state flag.
The red flag has a reverse side, is a symbol of the communist movement, so it will never again be a state flag.
The author should stop writing provocative articles; it's time for him to give in to the red and start living a normal life, not the past.
Protests against Covid passports held in Spain
In the Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, protests against the mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificate were held, reports the Europa Press agency.
In the Catalan capital, the number of participants in the action was approximately 3,000 people.
In Barcelona, COVID passports have become mandatory for going to bars, restaurants, gyms, nursing homes, and nightclubs.
Many of the protesters arrived at the rally without masks.
The slogans on their posters accused the state of totalitarianism and called for respect for the choice of citizens.
In Valencia, vaccination passports will also be required to enter entertainment venues and restaurants with more than 50 people.
Protesters in the city said that it was a medical dictatorship and the vaccination was an experiment.
Since the beginning of the pandemic, more than 5.2 million cases of coronavirus infection have been identified in Spain, and more than 88,000 patients have died.
Russia is also planning to introduce restrictions for the unvaccinated.
The government introduced bills on a single system of QR codes into the State Duma on 12 November.
It is expected that Russians will be able to visit places where mass events are held, cultural institutions, food and retail outlets by presenting either a vaccination or recovery certificate or a medical exemption from vaccination.
The same rules will apply to journeys by train and plane.
Anthracite Traditional 26cm cast iron grill with glass lid.
A cast-iron grill with an anti-stick Antracite TM Tradition coating.
The products are designed for daily use in the home.
The exceptional strength and durability of the non-stick coating, equivalent to that of natural stone, is designed for intensive everyday use.
Thick-walled cast case.
A five-layer non-stick coating of the latest generation.
Premium coverage enhanced with mineral particles.
Two layers of additional protection against scorching.
It has good non-stick properties for easy and pleasant preparation of healthy dishes without oil and fat.
No less than 4000 cooking cycles, when used in accordance with the operating instructions.
Suitable for all types of hobs, except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The guarantee for each item is 4 years (4 years for the body and 1 year for the non-stick coating, provided that the rules of use are observed).
Do not contain PFOA, LEAD, CADMIUM.
Pots and pans can be used in the oven without the glass lid.
The ease of cleaning.
By logic, the virus is constantly changing.
If a person is healthy and gets sick only once or twice a year with the flu, then their immune system is normal.
Immunomodulators are not recommended by doctors for prevention, in general.
Immunity is supported by a healthy diet and routine, plus exercise.
Based on this, vaccination against the flu and this coronavirus is pointless.
3M 5925 anti-aerosol filter.
Protection level FFP2, 2 pcs.
Part No. 713946.
FFP2 replacement filter for 3M 6000, 3M 7500 half-face masks and 3M full-face masks.
Protects the user's respiratory tract from various substances in the air.
It creates a reliable barrier for infectious particles.
This filter is designed for use in conditions when the concentration of harmful substances in the surrounding air exceeds the permissible value.
The filter can be used for bacteria/virus protection along with, for example, essential oils and other antibacterials.
The FFP2 protection class has a PEL value greater than 0.05 mg/m3, with a maximum concentration of pollutant 12 times the PEL.
Respirators of this class of protection are capable of retaining no less than 94% of harmful substances.
The pre-filters are attached to the respirator filters using a 3M 501 holder.
Features: low breathing resistance.
It doesn't obstruct the view.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half face masks and 3M full face masks.
Ensures compatibility with other PPE required in difficult working conditions.
The wide-eyed “constitutional monarch”, according to the internet, isn’t just getting on my nerves.
And this family PR - children, father...
I found Revva to be some kind of nobody.
All he knew was to harass Zaitsev - Batrukha and Batrukha.
Well, I found out, said once, and be quiet, let your friend show what he can do, that's why we fought.
A steep climb: how Chinese people are becoming skiers
The Olympics should attract millions of people to the slopes and help create international-level resorts in the country
China is hoping that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to participate in winter sports, which will allow the collection of the 1 trillion yuan designated by President Xi Jinping, but also promote the economic development of backward and remote provinces.
The Taiwu ski resort in Zhangjiakou, located not far from the site of the Winter Olympic Games, is becoming increasingly popular with the Chinese.
In addition to building infrastructure in the region, work is also being done to green the area: workers are planting trees.
The country has more than 700 ski resorts, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international level competitions.
In many regions of China where resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou, there are problems with snow.
The main task for the long term is to ensure a comfortable and interesting holiday at Chinese resorts, so that all newcomers become regulars.
However, it is still a long way off.
Organizing Committee adviser Justin Downs says the Chinese ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
Every winter more and more Chinese are heading to the slopes.
Fiona, a snowboarder from Beijing, is one of them.
It will take many more years for a ski culture to develop here, Downs said, despite the significant changes.
Many resorts are located in agricultural and mining areas.
These regions still need to be actively developed and the necessary infrastructure for rest created there.
70-year-old Gao Macong lives in Chunli, not far from the site of the Winter Olympics.
He notes that there has been a boom in winter sports tourism in recent years.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was built from Beijing to Chongli, now none of the locals are unemployed.
There are more and more shops opening in the country selling clothing and equipment for winter sports.
Restaurants are opening on the slopes, serving dishes of national cuisine.
Taiwan now even has a COVID-19 testing station.
China is striving to create a thriving winter sports industry, its athletes should become leaders in major international competitions, and resorts and equipment should reach world-class standards.
More than 500 million people in the world could fall into extreme poverty due to the pandemic, WHO says
More than 500 million people worldwide could be pushed into extreme poverty by the COVID-19 pandemic, which has set back global progress on universal health care, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank (WB) said.
To mark the 12 December International Day of Universal Health Coverage, WHO and the World Bank have published two complementary reports.
In them, they noted that the pandemic had led to disruptions in the provision of medical services and caused excessive stress in health care systems.
In this regard, for the first time in 10 years, the population’s immunization coverage decreased, and the death rate from tuberculosis and malaria increased.
WHO and the World Bank stressed that the pandemic has caused "the worst economic crisis since the 1930s, making it harder for people to pay for treatment."
This situation is pushing more than 500 million people "into extreme poverty, because they have to pay for these services out of their own pockets."
In October, UN Secretary-General Antonio Guterres said that the COVID-19 pandemic had pushed more than 100 million people into poverty, and more than four billion people have practically no social support.
The Makita KP0810 planer
An official Makita dealer.
A powerful motor is ideal for creasing.
Small weight and excellent balance.
Use of both standard and two-sided mini blades.
A simple quick-change blade system.
A new ergonomic body design, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce the effect of vibration on the user's hands.
Three V-shaped slots for removing different sized bevels.
The chip-out system is selectable: left or right.
A wife is a fur trapper's meat.
It's a disgrace.
Flying foxes have already gorged on pangolins, and now they're going after jellyfish.
Oh, how many wonderful discoveries can still be made by moles, mantids, and lemmings, for example.
Reuters: Taiwanese minister cut from "Summit for Democracy" livestream at White House request
Taiwan's digital minister Audrey Tang's appearance on a panel at the U.S.-led "Summit for Democracy" was stripped of video, according to a YouTube recording of the summit.
Reuters, citing sources, says the image was pulled at the request of the White House.
According to them, the reason was a map on which Taiwan was highlighted in a different colour from that of the People's Republic of China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map Ms. Tan displayed was compiled by the South African nongovernmental organization CIVICUS and ranked countries around the world by the degree to which they protected civil rights.
Taiwan was marked green on it as "free", and the People's Republic of China, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, Laos, and Vietnam were marked red as "closed".
After the minister displayed the map, the image on her side of the screen was replaced by a screenshot with the note that the opinions of the discussion participants "do not necessarily reflect the position of the US government."
China was not invited to the "Summit for Democracy."
Reuters sources note that the map presented by the Taiwanese minister could contradict Washington’s “One China” policy.
One official told the agency that after the map was shown, the National Security Council angrily contacted the State Department, accusing it of showing Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-organized "Summit for Democracy" was held from 9 to 10 December with the participation of representatives of 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society organizations and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
On the first day of the summit, the Nobel Peace Prize laureate and editor-in-chief of Novaya Gazeta, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international fund, through which money obtained through corruption would be given to charity.
Earlier today, Deputy Secretary of the Russian Security Council, Yuri Averianov, stated that the summit was “anti-Russian and anti-Chinese”.
They feed you the information that they are preparing food, and there is rotten meat everywhere, in fact, the meat remains with the butcher up until the last piece.
Classic journalism is to create a story out of nothing.
They boil not the meat but the horns and hooves, getting a substance like glue.
The finished product looks like a yellow, translucent, almost odorless, plastic-like strip, and is used as a natural gelatin.
In fact, there are no fewer harmful substances from the processing of waste than from its decomposition.
But this saves companies huge amounts of money.
That's why a story about the environment was invented for fools, who will also work for free to assemble the garbage for the idea.
My personal contribution to the environment is the refusal to purchase unnecessary things and the long-term use of things.
If I go over the limit, I don't throw it away, I donate it to charity.
Jogel Camp football shorts Jfs-1120-016, white/black (XL).
Description: Football shorts are great for playing football and exercising.
The shorts have a straight, comfortable fit.
A wide belt in combination with an adjustable drawstring provide a comfortable fit.
The fabric is highly durable, long lasting, lightweight and breathable, meeting the demands of the game at any level.
The brand's updated logo is on the left.
The shorts are packaged in a handy, reusable bag with a zip-lock closure.
Stylish appearance, straight cut, wide belt with drawstring, durable, long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Characteristics.
Get into specialties that allow you to work online.
Many of us get around it by working for someone else, but abroad.
But because of the difference in currency, it's profitable for us.
Compared to other countries, we are still poor.
Of course, you'll have to learn all kinds of things, but... working online allows you not to depend on the domestic labour market.
Our country creates almost no jobs.
And those who create them - you can't make much money on them.
Egoist-unity dining set with gold plating (4 pieces).
The “Royal Childhood” collection is one of the broadest and best-known collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It includes a host of charming silver spoons, forks and knives, rattles and teething rings, feeding bottles and cups.
All children's silver cutlery is subject to strict quality control.
Eco-silver, produced directly at the factory, and careful hand-polishing with cotton rollers make the products absolutely safe for a child.
Due to the disinfecting function of silver, regular use of silverware can support the body's natural immunity and even prevent some of the common childhood diseases.
The specialists of the factory received a grant to apply a complex, but very beautiful guilloche technique, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This allowed for the creation of incredibly bright and three-dimensional images on the products.
The collection is full of cute characters that will become a child's true friends.
Inca Squirrel, everything will be okay.
There's a second lung.
The lung tissue regenerates well if not all of it is removed; the remaining portion will expand.
If it is a pneumonectomy, however, the remaining lung will grow over time and function for two.
Try to breathe deeply yourself, fathers are stronger than daughters, they don't like tears very much.
Don't mourn too soon.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard space ship with six tourists on board made a suborbital flight
The New Shepard spacecraft from Blue Origin, with six tourists on board, made a suborbital flight on Saturday, December 11.
The journey, which was broadcast on the company’s website, lasted a total of more than ten minutes, after which the capsule with the passengers landed on Earth, TASS reports.
The launch of the carrier rocket was conducted from a spaceport near the American city of Van Horn (Texas).
The ship rose to an altitude of just over 100 km, and the space tourists found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The carrier rocket itself landed normally on the launch pad.
Blue Origin successfully carried out the first suborbital flight of the New Shepard spacecraft with passengers on board on July 20.
SKETCHES OF A VILLAGE MOSCOWITE.
Don't lump them all together - bad people exist, and you may have grievances against them for a specific reason...
but what does the number of children, age, pension fund, and other things have to do with it?
They write that they are "scumbags, they didn't give back the money."
But how many and when to have children is not your business, as long as they do not intend to hang these children around your neck.
And if this is ruled out, what right do you have to condemn them?
I guess that’s just how it is in education...
The chosen (by themselves) parents dictate their own rules, openly disregarding those that already exist.
And what if it applies to other aspects of life, such as court proceedings and so on?
For them, the laws are not written.
And what if dad does implement his method of upbringing and education?
It's awful and a very bad example for others.
The DESIGN WORKS 2719 "Flock of Stars" cross-stitch kit.
Kit contents: dark blue Aida 14ct canvas, DMC threads, sequins, beads, needle, pattern, instructions.
Design Works production began in 1987 and continues to be popular worldwide.
Many of the designs have been created by the well-known designer Ronald West.
Design Works cross-stitch kits come complete with quality aida cloth, 100% cotton floss, and a size 24 tapestry needle.
Also in the assortment you will find kits for embroidery on plastic canvas, Tobin embroidery is embroidery on napkins, table runners and tablecloths and much more.
China strengthens prevention and control of COVID-19 in cities where land ports are located
The Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism of the State Council of China has issued a circular to strengthen the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports in order to further prevent the importation of the infection from abroad.
According to the notice, people leaving the designated cities are required to provide a negative result of a COVID-19 nucleic acid test obtained within 48 hours before departure.
Those arriving in cities where land border crossings are located must take at least one COVID-19 nucleic acid test upon arrival.
The document states that these requirements will be in force from the day when the relevant provincial-level administrative units determine and publish the zones of the said cities, up to March 15, 2022.
In addition, cities that host land border crossings and meet certain criteria may consider the possibility of setting up buffer zones to prevent and control the COVID-19 epidemic within their jurisdiction.
Taisia Sokolova, as usual, is pulling Russian women towards the eastern ethnos with Indian films, which were only shown in cinemas in Russia.
No one in the west looked at this nonsense with the natives.
And how many such cities and towns forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Spring mattress Vivre Castom family, 140x195, item number: 5110704.
The layers of the RelaxFoam mattress, 2 cm: aloe latex 3 cm, coconut 2 cm TFK, coconut 2 cm, aloe latex 3 cm, RelaxFoam 2 cm.
The case is made of Splendid knitwear.
Knitted fabric made from cotton has a special design.
The base is wound with special synthetic fibres that ensure the special strength and softness of the material.
The cellular structure of the weave supports natural thermoregulation and moisture wicking during sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, weight 230 g/m2.
Dimaks OK Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The OK Basis spring orthopedic mattress is one of the most affordable models in the range.
The practical Balance Foam filler gives the mattress all the necessary orthopaedic properties, but at the same time keeps the price at a budget level.
This product is the optimal combination of price and quality.
Balance foam is a modern material that is obtained from PPU.
The filling is hypoallergenic and safe.
This is why foam is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate obtained in Europe, where these requirements are much more stringent than in Russia.
Another important quality of Balance Foam is its orthopaedicity: the material supports the correct position of the person for the entire duration of sleep.
Thanks to the foam, the mattress has a lower-than-average level of firmness, so the product is considered by the manufacturer to be quite soft.
The main load-bearing block in the mattress is the SuperSprings.
It is notable for its independent springs, with 256 elements per square metre.
The practical block supports up to 100 kg per sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, enhancing the orthopedic qualities of the foam.
The manufacturer offers a choice between a 12-inch or 18-inch spring unit without changing the final price.
Be sure to specify your preferences to the store operator when placing an order.
The mattress comes with a knitted cover, and the height of the model together with it is 21 cm.
The case is non-removable.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress is CertiPUR certified.
Bra Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG from the Arte Lamp manufacturer.
Perfect for rooms like the living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
The lighting fixture comes in color: gold.
The lamp uses E14 light bulbs.
Its total power allows it to light about 2 m2.
The manufacturer recommends this light for rooms decorated in the "Classic" style.
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs spoke about the “sad outcome” in relations between Russia and the United States
Deputy Foreign Minister of Russia Sergei Ryabkov, in an interview with Izvestia, evaluated the prospects for the relationship between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that the long history of interaction has led to unfortunate conclusions, and the problems between the two countries did not start yesterday.
There is one-sided, negative predictability, but in terms of any improvement in relations, everything is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion to a long journey that we've been on with this administration and with Trump and with Obama.
The problems did not start yesterday", the diplomat pointed out.
According to Ryabkov, the problem is related to the desire of the United States to impose its approach to a number of issues on Russia.
The deputy head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs added that he would not have dared to make optimistic predictions about the prospects for improving relations and would not have expected a change in Washington's position.
He explained that, with the exception of areas such as strategic stability and cybersecurity, no progress has been made.
At the same time, Russia calls on the United States to take a responsible approach to issues of international security and hopes that the signals will be heard, and the Americans will listen to the arguments of common sense.
Earlier, Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov said at a meeting with US Secretary of State Antony Blinken that Moscow was ready to resume dialogue with the United States.
Virologist warned of the danger of vaccinating with a nasal COVID drug outside of hospitals
People who have been vaccinated with a nasal COVID-19 vaccine may experience an allergic reaction and need medical assistance, so the first vaccination points for this vaccine should not be organized in airports and shopping centers.
This was reported by TASS by virologist, member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, head of the Laboratory of Bionanotechnology, Microbiology and Virology of Novosibirsk State University, Sergey Netesov.
It's easier to set up nasal vaccine points in airports and shopping malls, but I would do it only in medical facilities at first.
The fact is that there is a possibility of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine, it is small, but it is desirable that the person sit next to the doctor's office afterwards.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy drugs that work in literally a minute or two, which is sometimes very necessary," said Netesov.
In the opinion of the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccinations in shopping centres once there is experience in the use of the drug.
He also stressed that when using the nasal vaccine, it is important that it reaches the mucous membrane in the nasal cavity.
At the same time, there is a risk that the vaccine will not reach its destination if the person being vaccinated blows their nose after injection.
Painting by numbers on canvas, the anime "Demon Slayer" 5426 40x60.
Do you want to feel like a real artist?
Numbered coloring pages are interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many people like to draw, but sometimes they lack the abilities or skills.
This is a simple, but very exciting activity that allows you to relax, realize your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
There are many unusual paintings and “untrodden” topics in the assortment!
We come up with current topics on our own, and we try to make the result pleasing to you!
It's all very simple!
When coloring in the outlines on the canvas, they will not "melt", they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered to avoid getting lost in the paint.
The finished picture will become a bright element of the interior, the highlight of the room, attracting attention at first glance.
But this picture was not painted by just any artist.
You drew it yourselves.
With their own hands!
Serbia produced 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine
The Sputnik V vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
Serbia has produced about 2 million doses of the Russian Sputnik V vaccine, TASS quoted Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of the country Nenad Popovic as saying.
“At the state-owned Torlak Institute, about 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine have been produced so far, and we expect at least 4 million doses to be produced in the coming period”, said Popovic.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular among the Serbs.
In connection with this, the republic is planning to make an additional purchase of one million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
The Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of Serbia has also expressed interest in the production of the nasal “Sputnik V” vaccine and the “Sputnik Light” drug on the territory of the state.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin reported that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of the Russian coronavirus vaccine, Sputnik V, to Serbia.
A lama, it is said, is a true believer who makes up the church.
Whether or not these true believers exist, we cannot know.
Each of us would like to be such a true believer, and each of us tries to be.
But no one should speak for himself or for those who believe as he does that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say about themselves that they are true believers, then others can say the same thing.
Benartti Prime Orto S1000 145х190 mattress.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different firmness sides, the total height of the mattress is 22 cm.
The maximum permissible load on one bed is up to 150 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is in its own fabric pocket, which allows the springs to properly distribute the body's weight.
For additional protection, a layer of felt has been added to the spring block, which separates the mattress filling from the springs.
On one side of the mattress is a 1-inch layer of coconut coir, which adds additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
On the opposite side of the mattress a 3cm layer of coconut coir and a 1cm layer of natural latex have been added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made of cotton jacquard, quilted with an eco-friendly Hollcon material.
The fabric is treated with a special antibacterial Sanitized (Sweden) impregnation.
The impregnation ensures complete destruction of mould, prevents the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning, as well as aerators for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress is additionally reinforced around the perimeter with a latex frame, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., Remind me, please, what was the style of the marathon at the 2021 World Championships?
Can you see the cross-country ski track, along which the participants in the race should finish in the classic style?
Attention, question - what is Klyob doing to the right of Bolshunov and how does he want to get onto the ski run, if he was behind him on the turn before the gate?
And the “best finisher” over 1.5 km and after 50 km are two different things.
It was a long time ago...
I was, in fact, not even a driver.
He had the right, but he didn’t know how to drive.
They suggested going 250 km in one direction at MAZ!
Young, bad, agreed.
The owner is nearby, drinking vodka, and I'm driving.
First, as a king, he occupied the central axis!
A column formed up behind me.
I let it go.
Then the belt on the power steering broke.
Then the police stopped us.
The column was moving in an organized fashion, and their car broke down.
It needs to be towed.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk, and the driver was inexperienced.
And to him - how drunk are you?
You don't trip, you don't fall.
With the flashing lights in front of us and ahead we go!
In my opinion, he can’t get out of advertising, and he is the one to feel sorry for.
Pevtsov is saying the same thing: about the return of the retirement age.
All budgets have long been compiled taking into account the billions of roubles that pre-pensioners have not received.
Who is feeding them this rubbish?
In the UK, 1,239 cases of the Omicron strain of coronavirus were recorded in a day - RT in Russian
Over the past day, 1,239 cases of infection with the new omicron strain of coronavirus have been identified in the UK.
This is reported by Sky News.
In particular, 1196 new cases of the “omicron” strain were recorded in England, 38 people were infected with the new variant of the infection in Scotland, and five in Northern Ireland.
The total number of COVID-19 cases from the new strain in the UK has reached 3,137.
Previously, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine in a pessimistic forecast calculated that 75,000 people could die in England by April due to the coronavirus outbreak caused by the "omicron" strain.
Peskov warned of suffering for Western countries that are introducing anti-Russian sanctions
The press secretary of the President of the Russian Federation, Dmitry Peskov, commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the event of continued “aggressive actions” against Ukraine, including due to the alleged “invasion” of the country’s territory.
"It's impossible to impose restrictions on Russia and not feel the pain yourself," the official representative of the Kremlin said on the air of the Russia 1 television channel.
Peskov says "everyone in the world" understands this.
Earlier, it was reported that the United States was considering the introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as a last resort.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to impose restrictions that will complicate the conversion of rubles into dollars for Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
At the same time, the head of Sberbank, German Gref, is convinced that this is impossible.
From reasonable thinking people - accordingly reasonable comments!
Something about these simple-to-the-point-of-nausea recipes makes me want to throw up.
Apparently, the ideas have dried up.
Even in my distant childhood, my mother baked delicious pies and cakes, and it never occurred to me to compare a piece of bread with jam to a cake.
Ksenia, you don't need to bring anything to my mind, my mind must figure it out on its own!
"The inability of the mind divided from the Spirit to perceive" - what are you talking about?!
Imagine that you need to explain this to a stupid child, how will you do it?!
(Note that a child up to 3-5 years old still has open channels of communication with the subtle world, and the child may know more than you!)
New Caledonia rejects idea of independence from France
According to the final results of the third referendum on the independence of New Caledonia, an overwhelming majority of participants refused to leave France.
The French television channel BFM.TV reported this on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted were against independence.
3.51% of residents of the South Pacific archipelago supported independence from France.
2.99% of the ballots were annulled.
Voter turnout on that day was very low: only about 55% of the archipelago's residents went to the polls.
According to experts, the low turnout can be explained by the calls of separatists to refuse to take part in the referendum due to the coronavirus.
Paris refused to postpone the date of the referendum.
In October 2020, the people of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
A referendum on independence was already held in the region in 2018.
Most residents supported the archipelago remaining part of France.
New Caledonia is located almost 20,000 kilometers from mainland France.
In 1853, France declared New Caledonia its property.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, and the territory has a special administrative-territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and New Caledonia's administration allows the region to hold a vote on independence every two years.
Boris, if you don’t know the story, don’t write.
The name of the city of Arsk comes from the Bulgaro-Tatar word "artysh" (juniper).
The Udmurts (ary in Tatar) live in the northern regions of the Baltazin and Kukmor districts.
The Udmurts are wonderful, hard-working people, they have preserved their own language, live in friendship with the Tatars, and know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don't know your age, but I want to tell you that the Motherland will not abandon you.
The fools will throw out their “bold slogans”.
I'm telling you this with full confidence, based on my life experience.
Don’t spit in the well, you may have to drink the water!
WHO preliminarily considers “omicron” to be less dangerous than “delta”
The World Health Organization (WHO) has preliminarily determined that “omicron” is less dangerous than the delta strain of the coronavirus.
At the same time, there are data on a decrease in the effectiveness of vaccines when infected with the new variant of COVID-19.
As of December 9, "omicron" has been registered in 63 countries.
"The preliminary data and significantly altered antigen profile of the "omicron" strain allow us to assume a decrease in the effectiveness of the vaccine against infection and the transmission of the variant.
According to preliminary findings from South Africa, it ("severity of illness" - ed.) may be less severe than "delta"", the WHO said in a technical note.
The organisation notes that, so far, all registered cases of "Omicron" in the EU have been mild or asymptomatic.
At the same time, the new strain, according to preliminary data, spreads faster than the “delta”.
Two cases of infection with the omicron strain have been registered in Russia.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaleya Center reported.
The head of Rospotrebnadzor Anna Popova stated that there are currently no reliable data indicating that the new variant of the coronavirus is less dangerous than the others.
In fact, lack of sun is very critical for us southerners.
During the 10 days spent in St. Petersburg, sometime in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our departing plane took off above the clouds.
Only then did I understand what I had been missing in the beautiful city of St. Petersburg.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To experience something that has never been experienced before - to drink in the expanse with your eyes, your mouth and your skin!
The one who sees only water in the ocean,
Someone on the ground doesn't see the mountains.
Your world of adventures +7 905 989 9172 What’s App
Siberian Expeditions - we are capable of spoiling even the worst mood!
Svetlana S., no, no - they do not respond.
If your beloved, with whom you plan to spend the rest of your life, does not comply with your requests, it means that he is a parasite who does not want to give back as much as he takes.
And the problem with women is that they themselves, little by little, are putting everything on themselves.
And who is to blame here, if she herself grabbed the reins?
Ukraine has named four scenarios for Zelensky
Former deputy of the Verkhovna Rada, Vadim Denisenko, listed four scenarios for the development of events for the President of Ukraine, Volodymyr Zelensky, in 2022.
In his opinion, the head of state may remain without the support of the West, and may also make compromises on Donbas.
Denisenko said this on Sunday, December 12, in a publication on the Glavred website.
The first option, which Denisenko called "the perfect storm," suggests that Ukraine will no longer be supported by key western countries, having reached an agreement on the country's future without its participation.
Such a development would be conducive to a deep crisis that Kyiv may face in 2023.
"At the same time, there is a reduction in prices for key products that we traditionally export <...> internal protests and confrontation between the authorities and key FPGs (financial-industrial groups. - Ed.)", the former parliamentarian added.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the development of the situation - "war against all".
This forecast will come true in case of high turbulence in world politics, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
Due to this situation, the leadership of Ukraine may make compromises on Donbass, as a result of which there may be confrontation within the country.
At the end of summer, Zelensky's position will be weakened, and the likelihood of such a situation is up to 50-55%, according to the former People's Deputy.
The third option for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is a confrontation between groups of the population who disagree with Zelensky and the president, as a result of which the capture of control over the power bloc and the implementation of “populist initiatives” are possible.
Under this variant of the crisis, Zelensky will begin “reformatting power”, added Denisenko.
Another scenario is the transformation of Zelensky into the ‘Father of the Nation’.
This could be brought about by some event which will be a great shock to society.
"The event should be large enough to attract the attention of external partners and lead to an increase in support for Ukraine," Denisenko said.
Such a development of events is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a technogenic disaster or aggressive actions by Russia, believes the ex-deputy.
At the same time, the Russian side has already rejected any possibility of an "attack" on Ukraine more than once.
In Moscow, they noted that it was the Ukrainian authorities, NATO, and the United States that were increasing military activity at Russia’s borders.
Earlier, on November 11, the survey results of the sociological group "Rating" showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president fell to a record low, standing at 19.3%.
This is the lowest rating since his election as head of state.
Analysts predicted a situation in which, in the case of the upcoming presidential election in Ukraine, Zelensky would receive only 21.8% of the vote, while the former president of the country, Petro Poroshenko, would receive 14.5%.
However, only 19.3% of those surveyed expressed support for the president.
KAISER Sena shower system (74182)
The KAISER Sena (74182) shower system is one of the best choices in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability, which is also confirmed by numerous customer reviews on third-party internet resources.
When you buy this product from us, you also get a guarantee from us on the quality and operability of the product.
We deliver by transport companies throughout Russia and to any region.
In the event that you find any defects, we will happily refund the full amount that you have paid.
When you call the operator, you will be able to get a personal discount on this item.
Please leave a review on your use after purchase.
Thank you to the author for the story about a great athlete, I didn't know that Elena Shushunova had died, it's very upsetting to learn such things.
I remember how I rooted for her at the Olympics in Seoul, for us, residents of Primorsky Krai, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such a state of excitement, the emotions were off the charts. I remember the joy when Elena won.
They were also happy about all the other victories, just as they cheered for Salnikov, for the football players, for all the Soviet athletes back then.
On TV, I once saw a documentary about one of the Central American countries, and there the watermelons were rolled down the gangway onto the ship, like barrels.
Watermelons were the size of monsters.
I myself worked on the collection and loading of watermelons in the Astrakhan region many times in my youth, and I never came across watermelons weighing more than a pud.
I buy watermelons weighing 4-5 kg straight from the garden and not before the beginning of August.
Balconette bra with soft lace cups (size: 90E, color: beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, article number: 12008).
Balconette bra with soft lace cups on frames.
The lower part of the cup is reinforced with non-elastic transparent fabric.
The side of the cup, in the bra strap attachment area, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric at the fold, with no additional seams for comfort.
It is this element that allows the lace not to stretch.
The wealth of the lace can be appreciated thanks to the festoon along the neckline and under the bust.
The vertical ribs on the side panels of the single layer microfibre prevent the fabric from twisting on larger sizes.
I did not like the article at all, it was hateful and venomous.
Walked past people you know nothing about.
But now, many people enjoy breaking people down into atoms.
I hope that those who are commenting have honor and integrity and are experts in everything.
In Moscow, in the evening, you think 100 times whether to go to the store alone, the migrants are everywhere, there are crowds of them.
They consider themselves the owners.
And what about children's benefits and pensions? Are you serious?
The allowances are paltry and are paid for a maximum of 3 years, the pensions are 12000, someone wrote about dentistry, prosthetics has been paid for in our country for a long time and is very expensive.
People are from another planet.
France is doing badly, and we are doing well?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact texture, comfortable elasticity and hardness, properties of wear resistance and durability.
The BeautySon brand’s Sense series product is designed for restorative sleep for people with joint and vascular system diseases.
The design ensures an even distribution of load over the surface and a pronounced comfortable effect.
The Beautyrest Sense Hard S600 mini unit consists of an S600 mini independent spring unit with reduced spring height.
The company Beautyson uses spandbond, coconut coir and polyurethane as internal fillings.
Spunbond serves as an intermediate insulating layer between the soft materials and the springs.
The orthopedic foam impregnated with charcoal is shaped with a contour cut on the surface, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is a hypoallergenic material that gives the mattress high moisture wicking and air permeability properties.
The outer cover of the mattress is made from a dense jacquard fabric with synthetic fibres.
The material is strong and long-lasting, does not wear and does not require special care.
The poet arrested for the action in Red Square: “They give 10 days for a quote from Yevtushenko, here is the power of poetry!”
In the beginning of the week, the 21-year-old poet Alexander Volchenkov was arrested for ten days.
The HSE student was detained on Red Square with a placard that had the hashtag #thepoetofrussiaismorethanjustapoet written on it.
This quote belongs to the writer Evgeny Evtushenko.
A protocol was drawn up against Alexander for a repeated violation of the procedure for conducting a public action.
He was detained for the first time on January 23 on Pushkin Square, at a rally in support of Alexei Navalny.
“The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, now interest in it, unfortunately, has been lost, and there is a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems on the Internet under this hashtag”, explains Alexander.
We spoke to the young poet to find out the details of his arrest and to learn more about the message of his message.
How did the police officers treat you during your arrest this time and in the past?
What questions did the department ask, and how did they comment on your action?
This time, the officers were more polite, the arrest was as maximum and polite as possible, as strange as that may sound in the context of this word.
The OMON officers took Pushkinskaya and took it hard.
They asked me the standard questions about motivation.
When they heard, in principle, they looked at it, if not approvingly, then understandingly.
With the exception of the blowhole on all 4 sides of the monkey cage, everything was perfectly correct, but I knew what I was getting into.
And if after the action under this hashtag, at least a few people start to write their poems, I will not have spent these 10 days in vain.
Maxim, according to the protocol, talk to each other in the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe.
And at public and official events, they speak in the language of the people around them, so that everyone understands what happened in the Bundestag on 25 September 2001, or in their native language via a translator.
This is a protocol and nothing more, by the way, Angela Merkel speaks Russian well and yet she uses a translator.
And at official events, a stenographer takes notes the old-fashioned way with a pen, and a stenographer is not required to know several languages.
If you don’t want to say much, just say no!
But there's so much water.
Well, go as a tourist for six months "to the Andes, then to Nepal".
Before this, turn all assets into liquid shares.
And to gradually sell these shares, opening an account in any bank in the world.
To sell not in dollars but in a currency less dependent on the United States, such as the Swiss franc.
And then file for a divorce from America.
However, this is not all that keeps Americans in the United States.
It keeps them believing that the U.S. is better than anywhere else.
That is how they are grown.
The Hansgrohe Quattro three-outlet mechanism (15930180).
Collection: Quattro; Type: Concealed installation mechanism; Purpose: for a mixer, for a bath, for a shower; Integrated systems: yes; Type of installation: built-in (in the wall); Body material: brass; Concealed installation mechanism: included; Number of mounting holes: 1; Country of origin of the brand: Germany; Manufacturer's article number: 15930180; EAN code: 4011097345239.
Additional information: pressure regulator required; supplied with: ceramic cartridge, sealing flange; 3 outlets; simultaneous use of 2 outlets (showers) possible; suitable for all Quattro external units; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers tell how potatoes help with age-related disorders
The study found that potatoes are rich in vitamins and minerals that help to improve blood circulation and reduce cholesterol levels.
The root vegetable contains B group vitamins, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic acid, and pantothenic acid.
All of these elements help the body's systems to function.
In addition, potatoes help in the fight against age-related disorders.
Its high fibre content makes it beneficial for the digestive system, and regular consumption can also help to prevent high blood pressure and atherosclerosis.
However, for maximum benefit, the root vegetable is best stewed or boiled, rather than fried in oil.
The Daily Express previously warned that potatoes can be dangerous for diabetics, like other foods with a high glycaemic index.
These are foods with carbohydrates that break down quickly into sugar, such as sugar, sweet soft drinks, white rice, and white bread.
In early December, Kommersant newspaper warned of a possible shortage of Russian table potatoes, noting a reduction in its production in personal subsidiary farms and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the current product shortage can only be covered by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates will be removed from Yandex search results
The candidates are in danger of being eliminated
In 2015, copyright holders from the RAEK/Media cluster compiled a list of the 100 largest pirate sites in the Russian Internet, and most of them ceased to exist, says Karen Kazaryan, Director General of the Institute for Internet Research.
However, Kinogo, Lostfilm and Filmix have managed to survive thanks in part to regular domain name changes, he adds.
For example, on Lostfilm, which is available in the search results of both "Yandex" and Google, you can watch pirated copies of the Netflix series "Squid Game" and "Tenderness" by director Anna Melikyan - an original series of the largest video service in Russia, ivi (which is part of AIV).
On Kinogo, which is also available in search engine results, you can watch the new animation "Encanto," but, judging by the quality of the video, it is what is known as a screener (a pirated copy of the film shot in a movie theater).
The series “Univer. 10 Years Later” on the TNT channel (part of Gazprom-Media) is available on Filmix, which can also be found through search engines.
Svetlana M., forgive me, of course, but I wouldn't care if my son was offended for his mother or not.
If we have some kind of misunderstanding, it's better not to get involved at all, with the mob in our path.
Of course, it's good that such things are rare.
Soft-cup bra without underwire and front closure in coffee colour, 135I GI1265.
The T-shaped back is internally reinforced with crisscrossed elastic cotton and Lycra bands.
The bra is made of microfiber in combination with a mesh fabric for breathability.
Cups are lined with cotton-blend fabric for a comfortable fit.
Magiclift's unique design (cross-over under the bust and along the décolleté) to lift, separate and support the bust.
The wide comfortable straps on the lining with microfleece are adjustable at the back.
Lyudmila, China now has the most advanced space technology.
Russia is already hopelessly behind.
"This idea developed by the Poles" - it would be more accurate to say that Poland only adapted the 1776 idea for itself, but developed it quite effectively.
In fact, the slogan "The outskirts are not Russia" appeared in 1848.
In general, this does not change the essence of the matter.
I watched her interview, the girl said that her biggest dream was to grow wings, her father was always pulling her down.
Well, it's all very suspicious.
Well, she got into a university, but what’s next?
Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara wall lamp.
A wide circle, framed by "molecules" of light, provides the most uniform and bright illumination of the space.
"Atomic" or "molecular" design, which reflects the nature and natural essence of each object, remains relevant and allows you to set the accents in the interior to best effect.
One of the characteristic features of such lamps is the weightlessness of the design.
Using thin, almost invisible wires, which can be adjusted in height, the illusion is created that the chandelier is hovering in the air.
The metal gold armature and matte-white mini-chandeliers will easily complement any palette, and the pendant chandelier and wall sconce presented in the collection will make a ready-made ensemble for lighting the living room, bedroom, and hallway.
Well, it's a matter of taste, as they say.
I really liked "Tarhun," of course, not the current one.
The bottled juices in the tall glass cylinders were very tasty.
Three servings of syrup is overkill, in my opinion.
Two was just right.
Dimatex Micro Ultimate mattress, size 160x190
Micro Ultimate orthopedic spring mattress.
The model is convenient in that it has two different softness surfaces - high stiffness and slightly more average.
The product includes only high-quality and premium fillers, which have proven themselves only from the best side.
Springs: in the centre of the model there is a block of independent "micropack" springs.
This means that there are 2,000 springs per sleeping place, which work independently of each other.
It is their functioning that gives the unique point-by-point adjustment.
"Micropac" is the highest-frequency of all the variety of "Dimaks" spring blocks, so it has a pronounced orthopedic effect and is considered premium.
Fillers: Above and below the springs is a combination of layers of coir and natural latex.
The only difference is the order of the tiles.
If one side has latex, then the other side has coconut coir.
This tandem of fillers has long been considered a classic, since it gives the mattress not only orthopedic, but also anatomical properties.
If the coir provides the correct support for the back, then the latex gives the surface adaptation to the human body.
Cover: The model comes with a quilted Aloe Vera knit cover.
At the client's request, it can be made both removable and stationary.
The overall height of the product is 27 cm, and the recommended load on the sleeping surface is 170 kg.
Warranty and safety: the warranty period is 3 years.
The mattress has all the necessary certificates and documents confirming its complete safety and reliability in use.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress is CertiPUR certified.
Estonian scientists will look for life on Venus
The Massachusetts Institute of Technology, in cooperation with the Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies, is preparing three space missions to Venus to search for signs of life in the atmosphere, reported "Aktuaalne kaamera" on Sunday.
The goal of the five-year missions is to assess the habitability of Venus' clouds, and then look for life there.
For the project, the Tartu scientists have proposed instruments for measuring the acidity and oxygen content of Venus' clouds.
Up until now, it was thought that the clouds of Venus, the closest planet to Earth, were too acidic for life to exist there, but Venus was probably originally a terrestrial planet.
A sample from Venus is due to arrive during the third mission.
Suppose that if we find life there, the main question will be whether it is like the Earth's or different.
If it is very similar, it will be obvious that life on Earth did not start on Earth.
If it is different, then it is more likely that life began on Earth," said the head of the Estonian team of the Venus Life Finder project, Mihkel Payusalu.
A hat, not a phone...
Six months is all it takes, and that's the price...
I'm already tired of this Chinese nonsense...
They can't make a quality phone...
No matter what, my Samsung has already survived three of these (my friends have already thrown them away) and will continue to survive!
Metaverses will change Russian business
The topic of the metaverse became popular in the fall of this year, when Mark Zuckerberg announced the transformation of Facebook into Meta.
For the market, this event was an important signal: the largest player confirmed the development of a new format of digital interaction between people.
And this means that business in Russia, like everywhere else in the world, will invest in the creation of its own metaverses and their subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as an extension of objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, there is a trend to create remote interactions during the pandemic, because people are tired of separation and restrictions.
On the other hand, it is the result of businesses’ desire to develop ecosystems and adapt operational models to them.
The third - they are a logical continuation of the trend of digitalization of assets, when any rights, securities, works of art and even money are transferred to a digital format.
You're right Anya, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating properly, you no longer want to eat anything too fatty and unhealthy.
Of course, we will have the traditional Olivier salad and herring under a fur coat on the holiday, but no one is forcing me to eat everything at once.
You can eat it by the spoonful, try it - and that's enough.
After all, there are really ten days off ahead, so you can prepare any tasty and healthy dishes.
And how much hellish effort, time, and resources she devoted to training.
And after doing five quadruple jumps, she left without gold.
And she also understands that in four years time for the next Olympics she won't make it, i.e. she'll never be an Olympic champion.
And to those who haven't done just sports or can't imagine all the circles of hell she's gone through, DON'T YOU DARE JUDGE.
The British economist failed to predict 2022
British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to make a forecast for 2022, as in his opinion, such attempts will end in failure.
He wrote about this in an article for Project Syndicate.
The expert believes that the next year will be full of unpredictability, and any trend can change the turnover.
The most important factor remains the coronavirus pandemic, with inflation in second place, he says.
O'Neill also admitted that he does not know if the price rises are temporary or not.
As the specialist pointed out, even before the pandemic it was clear that "the world of the central bank's infinite generosity has outlived itself" and it was time to return to a relationship where interest rates adjusted for inflation would correlate with expected GDP growth rates.
O'Neill noted that, against the backdrop of the pandemic, continuing the ultra-soft economic policy may, according to some experts, lead to a new wave of inflation.
In addition, attention should be paid to the issue of productivity growth, as well as the rise in poverty and climate change, summed up O'Neill.
Earlier, the head of the Global Research Department at Otkritie Investment Mikhail Shulgin said that positive expectations for the dollar exchange rate in 2022 remain, but the potential for growth will be less significant.
Among the risks to the value of the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and credit policy of the Federal Reserve, the dynamics of oil prices, and fears amid the coronavirus pandemic.
I'm forced to agree.
But there is one thing to be happy about: if you compare yourself with yourself, there were fewer containers five years ago.
Things are better now.
There is progress, but it is sluggish.
There's another problem: there are a lot of environmental initiatives in cities, but people don't know about them.
All sorts of eco-taxis that pick up waste from your home.
Yes, it's a banal point: the recycling point is used by the dregs of society.
Rarely do people throw glass and metal in there.
Well, and the author...
Sausages with cat meat at Soviet factories?
"Low" chocolate in the USSR?
Well, yes, they aren’t as tasty as Doshirak, I understand...
And I would now wrap up Soviet candies with white filling.
There are no more of them.
"Pilot" is not released, and "Romashka" is not the same at all...
EVA car mats (rhombus) for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
EVA car floor mats are made from high-quality material produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats consists of diamond-shaped cells.
The thickness of the mats is 10 mm, and the depth of the cells is 5-6 mm.
Mats do not absorb or pass on moisture.
All the dirt is evenly distributed in the cells, keeping the surface clean.
The material used to make the mats is elastic, wear-resistant and odourless.
It retains its properties in the temperature range from -50 to 50 °С.
The mats are unpretentious in use and are suitable for year-round use.
EVA floor mats cover the standard carpet as much as possible, covering the area where the left foot rests.
The rear tunnel is covered by a carpet.
The edging is made from a super-strong automotive strap.
Dimax Practik Basis Plus V13 180x220 cm mattress
The Dimax (Dimax) Practic Basis Plus in13 mattress consists of a single type of filling.
This is a 13-centimetre-high panel of artificial latex.
Due to the characteristics of the material, the mattress has a symmetrical medium firmness on both sides.
The item is covered with a jacquard cover with a zipper on the comfort layer, removable or non-removable, depending on your choice.
PUF is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial latex (PUF) are characteristics similar to the natural analogue, but at a lower cost.
Synthetic latex is resilient and elastic, but, unlike the natural material, it has greater stiffness.
It shapes the anatomical surface of the mattress with high-quality support, ensuring a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not retain moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the durability and wear-resistance of the mattress.
A quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, inexpensive, and resistant to temperature changes, this mattress is ideal for setting up a sleeping area in a dacha or country home.
Its universal medium stiffness and maximum load of up to 100 kg make this mattress suitable for most categories of users.
Russians have given car dealers about 4.5% of the country's GDP
According to the results of 10 months of 2021, Russians spent 2.784 trillion rubles on the purchase of new cars, which is 28% more than for the same period last year, according to statistical data from the Russian Automotive Market Research Agency (NAPI).
To put it in perspective, approximately the same amount (about 3 trillion rubles) was spent by the state to support citizens and the economy during the coronavirus pandemic.
In September last year, at a meeting of the heads of state of the Shanghai Cooperation Organization, President Vladimir Putin said that such a sum is comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) in 2020.
In terms of income, the Korean brand Kia leads the Russian market.
In the ten months of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 325.7 billion rubles, which is almost 24% more than a year earlier.
The related Kia brand of Hyundai has seen an even greater increase - more than 35%, and revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at 279.3 billion rubles.
This brand is also in the lead in terms of the increase in the average weighted price of a car - over the year, it went up by almost 21%, to 1.94 million roubles - only Changan, Chery, Geely and Mercedes-Benz had a more dynamic price increase.
However, the volume of sales for Korean brands has not grown as significantly: according to the statistics of the Automobile Manufacturers Committee of the Association of European Business in Russia, in quantitative terms, Kia has sold 9.4% more cars over the same period than last year.
Hyundai - almost 12%.
Rounding out the top three in terms of sales volume in monetary terms is the Japanese Toyota - Russians spent 275.5 billion roubles on cars of this brand in the first 10 months of the year, which is 14% more than a year earlier.
Following the Japanese is Mercedes-Benz with a figure of 266.1 billion roubles (+75%) - the German premium brand has increased both its sales volume (by 37%) and average vehicle price (almost by 28%, up to 8.2 million roubles).
“Mercedes-Benz is experiencing a simultaneous increase in sales and average price - more, for example, than BMW - which explains the greater growth in financial capacity”, explained General Director of the National Association of Car Importers, Tatiana Arabadjieva.
In terms of sales growth, Chinese brands are showing fantastic results, having also significantly increased their financial capacity this year."
Russian Lada, in terms of income growth, is showing average market indicators (plus 28%), and Russians spent 229.4 billion rubles on Lada cars over 10 months.
Companies whose car sales in units in 2021 fell are at the same level as last year in terms of financial capacity: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is actually in the red – in 10 months, Russians spent 12 billion rubles on off-road vehicles and pickups of this brand, compared to 12.4 billion rubles a year earlier.
Amid problems with the supply of auto components and production disruptions that have affected the entire global automotive industry, automakers continue to continuously adjust prices – AvtoVAZ, for example, raised the cost of Lada models seven times this year, with the latest price increase (by 8-10,000 roubles) taking place at the end of November.
Other car manufacturers regularly change the price tags on their products.
The volume of the Russian car market in monetary terms will continue to increase - in addition to the shortage of cars, inflation is also contributing to this, as well as the desire of car manufacturers to make up for past losses, experts say.
In the context of car shortages, I think that many carmakers have even managed to pass on some of the costs of past periods, which they were not able to include in the price of cars in the past,
says VTB Capital auto industry analyst Vladimir Bespalov.
I believe that in financial terms, the car manufacturers are doing very well at the moment, maintaining high margins on sales."
An indirect indicator of this is the rate of growth in the cost of cars, which has been observed during 2021; prices for new cars are growing at a faster rate than inflation, the expert clarifies.
In the long term, the market will grow both in terms of quantity and in terms of money, but mainly due to inflation and the complication of the design of the machines themselves, predicts Bespalov.
With more supply, the ability to raise prices will be limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian car market will continue to grow next year, even if the growth in car prices slows, car manufacturers will be able to get their income from the volumes, notes independent automotive industry consultant Sergey Burgazliyev.
Considering the high demand and low supply, automakers are now trying to get the maximum profit from each sold car, notes Burgazlyev.
It is not expected that there will be an increase in the volume of car production for at least the next six months, and in Russia the frenzy is also fuelled by the uncertainty of citizens about the future.
Against the backdrop of the situation in the market, cars turned out to be a good investment object - a car bought a year ago, even with a mileage, can now be sold for more than the initial price, the expert notes.
Biden spoke about the transfer of U.S. military to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The United States never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a "Russian invasion."
U.S. President Joe Biden made such a statement.
"There were never any plans like this," the White House chief of staff said in response to a reporter's question about whether the U.S. had given up on such an idea.
Biden noted that in the event of an escalation of the situation around Ukraine, Russia will face economic consequences.
At the same time, he emphasized that the United States and NATO have no obligation to use military force to protect Ukraine in the event of an escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of American troops being used unilaterally to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invades Ukraine, the United States will send forces to NATO countries in Eastern Europe (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, the Czech Republic, and Estonia).
"We will have to put more American and NATO troops on the eastern flank, the B9 - all those NATO countries for which we have a sacred obligation to defend them from any attack by Russia," Biden said.
Earlier, the press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, emphasized that Moscow has no intentions of invading the territory of Ukraine.
At the same time, he pointed out that Moscow sees the problem in the combat use of the drones delivered by Turkey by Kiev, as well as in the fact that “American weapons are approaching our territory”.
I immediately leave such job interviews.
If already during the interview they want to force me to listen to screams, wait for hours, drink some incomprehensible brew, and wash another cup - it's scary to imagine what will happen at work.
I will find a normal place for myself, without an HR layer, where you can talk to the manager right away.
Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 100x185 cm mattress
The average-height Promatex-Orient Monolith Combi 16 springless mattress is made of alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is medium-firm, the other side is moderately firm.
The elegant white jacquard cover is quilted with a synthetic filling and has a zipper around the perimeter.
Two types of stuffing.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of fillers.
Between the latex layers are thin sheets of coconut coir.
The layered structure of the mattress is characterized by increased wear resistance, durability and load-bearing capacity.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, and breathable material.
The filler holds its shape and recovers quickly after use.
Coconut coir increases the strength of the product and naturally has antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows the creation of a load-bearing orthopedic sleeping place that will serve buyers for many years.
Versatility and orthopedic support.
The mattress is suitable for people of different body types and ages.
A medium-firm surface is a universal fit with a balanced combination of orthopaedics and comfort.
The reverse side of the model is less comfortable for soft tissues, but has more pronounced orthopedic properties.
A moderately firm sleeping surface is more relevant for those who need "relief" for the back and a healthy posture.
The mattress is ideal for both a single person and a couple.
The latter in particular will appreciate the stable surface and the lack of the "wave" effect, when oscillations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the opposite side, disturbing the sleeper.
Studio desktop easel 20*24*54(65) cm for a 40 cm canvas.
The Studio desktop easel with adjustable height top holder.
It is suitable for small-sized canvases.
The material is natural beech, varnished.
It will be convenient for both beginning and professional artists.
A smooth adjustment of the angle of inclination.
It is equipped with a support shelf for canvases and tablets.
The upper stretcher holds the canvas securely.
The maximum height of the easel is 65 cm, and the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a fraudster calls from a similar number, like a "police officer" or another member of a law enforcement agency, it is not effective to immediately hang up, and it is unlikely that you will have time to add them to a blacklist.
Because to confirm his lie about being part of the power structures, he quickly repeats the challenge and continues to frighten and persuade.
We need more useful recommendations for the people.
That's just nonsense...
I really don't believe that it was like that.
They no longer know what to come up with, who to accuse.
They got to the Queen.
And most importantly, in their opinion, everyone else is to blame, except for the most-most...
Wouldn't it be easier to leave people alone from coercion, of course, if our people care about their people.
Perhaps all strains of the virus will disappear...
Like in Japan... before the elections, the influence was weakened and the number of infections became less...
The felting wool set "Assortment No. 2" is 100% merino wool, 4x10 g.
Wool felting as a craft originated eight thousand years ago, but it was very difficult to find animal wool for this occupation, and colored wool even more so.
But now voila!
We present semi-woolen natural wool for felting from a Russian manufacturer, which you don't have to chase through the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of felting wool allow for the creation of bright, one-of-a-kind items.
For example, you can make a cute toy for yourself or your baby, a craft, jewellery, home decorations and even clothes and accessories.
Imagine a pair of "married" fluffy little sheep on your shelf, a small picture frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that will look great with your new dress, or unique home slippers that no one else will have...
Bring your ideas to life, "crashing" this wonderful wool!
Maria Kartashova, what does “in response to this” mean?
I, on the other hand, do not voice my thoughts; I mentally curse all of you.
I mentally cut off the heads of everyone who didn't give me a seat, mentally send them into the gutter and burn all the cars that get in my way, mentally all of them!
And I can even smile at you.
But I remember that thought is material!
Peter, Nicholas II did not sign a single death sentence during his reign.
Even to the likes of Koba and his gang.
And Bloody Sunday is already the invention of the Bolsheviks.
Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190 mattress.
A mattress, firm on both sides.
The natural material, latex-coated coconut coir, does not cause allergic reactions and adds the necessary stiffness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK spring block (512 springs per single bed) will provide unrivalled comfort and correct back support during sleep.
Cotton jacquard cover, filled with 200 g.
The hallcon provides protection and comfort.
The maximum load per bed: 130 kg.
My little horse.
Pony house with accessories, 6 in the display.
This adorable little pony lives in a cozy folding pink house.
If you open the cottage, you can install a kitchen in one of its halves, and on the other half, you can place a table with treats for guests.
The pony has big beautiful eyes, its mane and tail can be brushed with a brush.
The set includes a 9 cm pony, a comb, a house (2 halves), a built-in table (2 parts), a kitchen (2 parts), and accessories: scissors (2 parts), a heart-shaped cake (2 parts), a juice bottle, 2 glasses, a teapot, a cup, and a saucer.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90х190х27 mattress weighs 27.9 kg.
The alternating layers of latex and firm coconut coir give the effect of enhanced body support.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress has no problem supporting a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
However, there is no wave effect: the spouses lying next to each other do not roll towards each other regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model have undergone careful quality control.
They ventilate, do not become damp, and do not absorb odours.
A unique microclimate is created due to full air circulation, which is conducive to a healthy rest.
A high-strength hot melt adhesive was used to bond the parts together.
A film by Alexander Sokurov’s student won the European “Oscar” for best editing
The Oscar-nominated Russian film “Fists Unclenched” received an award from the European Film Academy (which is also called the “European Oscar”) in the category of “Best Editing”, reports “Moskovsky Komsomolets”.
The competition jury, voting online due to the difficult epidemiological situation, assessed the outstanding skill of the filmmakers.
The maximum number of awards this time went to the film by Jasmila Zbanic (Bosnia) "Where are you going, Aida?"
The main character of the film is a translator for a UN mission who is trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the film “Unclenching the Fists”, directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of Alexander Sokurov’s workshop), this film tells the story of the difficult relationship between a powerful father and his children who are growing up and want to break free from their father’s authority in North Ossetia.
Earlier, it was announced that this film was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As regular friendly meetings of the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan, and Turkey show, in my opinion, you, to put it mildly, are not in the know.
Only yesterday the President of Azerbaijan approved the opening of a joint Azerbaijani-Russian KAMAZ enterprise.
